Mr. Stuckey promised them a building in 18 months, even though, he said, “they didn’t have any floor plans, they didn’t know who had sat next to who, or even where much of their staff was.”
Arriving in Sapa cold and wet, we headed straight to one of the best cafes in town for some Guardian readers food – butternut squash burgers with parmesan. The tandem waiting outside was generating quite a lot of attention, and by the time we reluctantly left we had to run the gamut of 20 Hmong women who couldn’t seem to decide whether they were more interested in our tandem, or in selling us overpriced tourist handicraft tat – they settled for the latter.
dance forever in the gloam.
50 is nifty I’ve been told. Well I know that I’ll do my best to enjoy and move forward and get to know me as a person instead of just as a mom. I know that I have again gained some of my weight back and that is unacceptable so that means more work to be done. However I knew that I was going to be working on this and April 23rd is that day to start on it. I don’t have to start over since I’m not back to where I was but I am part ways there so just going to continue on this life style journey of getting to be the healthiest me I can be.
Every hour I spend tutoring students makes me wonder even more about the things that are taught in school. Just in the past few weeks, I have helped kids learn how to do polynomial long division and to use the three different methods for solving quadratic equations. Also, I have student who is in Geometry this year, and this week I helped him memorize all the different formulas for the length of an intercepted arc of a circle. Why?! Why does every child need to know these things?
Several sites are reporting that Simon has said it’s his best work in 20 years, which would be back in the Rhythm of the Saints era (and would slight only You’re The One and Surprise, and possibly Capeman, depending on what he counts). It also supposedly has a bluegrass influence; though apparently refers to Quicksilver playing on two tracks, not necessarily the entire album; a mix of styles and influences would be typical of a Paul Simon album, and would indeed hearken back to the Graceland/Rhythm era. (Regardless of what the final version sounds like, the current Spanish version of Amulet is another indicator of that sort of direction, as is, of course, the funky feel of the first single.)
Back Off And Let Those Men Who Want To Marry Men, Marry Men.
If you look in the above picture to the far left you will see a strappy-leafed ginger plant. Ignore the lilly pillies - they are still there.
Contacts bar for 4 contacts with images and communication history (SMS, IM, email, web feeds)
Hatch EE, Linet MS, Kleinerman RA, Tarone RE, Severson RK, Hartsock CT, Haines C, Kaune WT, Friedman D, Robison LL, Wacholder S. Association between childhood acute lymphoblastic leukaemia and use of electrical appliances during pregnancy and childhood. Epidemiology 1998; 9: 234-245.
Stephen Oliver / Containing a broken column; Industrial tableau / 78-79
I have been denied the blessing of seeing my grandchildren grow up. My son moved to New Zealand and I have been there. The contrast between there and here is miles apart. NOBODY lives in fear. Children ride their bikes, play in the parks (which are spotless) and have a REAL childhood. The elderly take strolls and THEY ARE SAFE. There are no security gates, high walls, electric fencing, or walls around their houses. The people are so peaceful and live in harmony with one another. My son happened to leave his wallet on the roof of his car at a shopping mall. when he realised what he had done, he went back to his car and lo and behold it was still there. Now that must tell you something. It is so clean and peaceful. If we could afford it we would emigrate there, BUT WE ARE STUCK!!!! I am sick to death of hearing about "apartheid". They can thank God that the white man has handed them so much. They are hell bent on destroying this beautiful country of ours through their corruption, theft, and the countless taxes we are paying to line their pockets. "They pick and we pay". What is it going to take to change things?
In the case of both black voters and environmental extremists, he figures he can take their votes for granted anyway, so the president has nothing to lose.
1. Foam Roller-IT Bands, Hammies, Quads, glutes
Understand how God, who so loves the world that He gave is only son to die, so that we may have life, feels regarding all these people we meet. I bear responsibility for not saving that dog. Oh, you, and I, can rationalize that away and make it OK, make excuses why it was not our responsibility, but the reality was I was the one who knew the dog was there and I was the one who did not want to make the small personal sacrifice to go and pick it up, to save it from death. How much more will God hold us responsible for the lives around us. Think about it. Go and read that scripture again and understand God’s heart and will. The early church was committed to helping each other out, committed to feeding the poor and mostly loving others as God loves us. At the prison this weekend I several times said “We are the only Jesus people here can ever see” for anyone who is a true believer understands that God desires we work to do His will, to bring life and save the lost from the certain death that comes without God.
Much has been written about the mismanagement of National Feedlot Corporation that most of you have already heard the gory details.
Some Elector Counts
If that’s not enough, provide a quote from a local minister:
In the past several months, I have realized that you really can always count on at least one person kicking you when you are down.
8. Peter Baldrachi - Tomorrow Never Knows
- 8.75″x 2″ x 5″
I started with a blank journal and decorated the cover.
at me, is it foolish, shameful, arrogant to say this,
My favorite everyday card is this one: You're Awesome. Seriously, you can get a card for yourself (hee hee) and give some out to those who deserve it.
Which I'm actually not supposed to eat.
For a 12K (Bloomsday) and a 10K race!
1 lb. lard
After convincing my mom it would be $35 well spent ($45 in her case, since she has so much hair), we booked our appointments for my trip back home last week.
So I raise my virtual glass of champagne to you, my virtual foodie friends! You are the ones that help me keep this blog going. Here is a toast to you and to The Essential Rhubarb Pie!
Use all of its place
Hampshire and take South Carolina and
I have an episode of ‘Southland’ airing in March. I start shooting a movie with a director friend in late April, and after that I don’t know, that’s one of the perks of being actor, not knowing too far into the future.
I have taken the last few months off from blogging due to a way too busy life! As you may (or may not) know, I am a mom of five children and am also in Nursing School. Classes are pretty intense. Between studying, clinicals and caring for my family, I was unable to post. I thought of it often, but the time just wasn't there.
*Knowledge and understanding of areas of life larger than one’s self/ Depth and Breadth
In addition, this map (as well as the road atlas and state maps that started to accumulate on the table) caused Jesse to pull out his old puzzle map. Tonight, after dinner, he asked us to hold this map and play a game of capital guessing with us. Turns out he's been looking at this map a lot lately. He knew most of them! Nicolas, hoping to do better in his world capital knowledge, then brought the world map off the wall. (I too have been humbled by this nine year old. Yesterday he beat me in Bananagrams.)The whole world in his hands:In awe of his Papa. : )
I will continue with my adventures tomorrow, in the meantime do put Thursday 24th May in your Vintage Diary as it is The Avington Brocante in Hampshire, and I will be there with my French finds next week.
Wow, I bet she was just flattered. What a beautiful picture. Looks like a real keeper to me!
YES I have looked online. NO I don't want to use a bunch of spices or onions or sausage or other types of mushroom. I just want the chanterelle flavor to be LOUDER.
Root vegetables are best harvested during this time, they are most beneficial in nutrients and energy.
“I want her family’s name linked with mine. I want my children to have the Bradford White lineage. I want her father’s money, societal standing, and public image. Eventually, I’ll inherit part of the family shipping business and law firm. And it goes without saying that Elizabeth is the most attractive woman I’ve ever known, albeit not the most compliant or cooperative, but I can get that out of her given enough private, physical persuasion.”
At the beginning of the twentieth century the modernist movement set about destroying the form and grammar of traditional art and thus the content, and made it both unintelligible and uninteresting. In the 60’s cultural Marxists of the new left became the "elites". They hate our culture and traditions and are destroying our young people.
This is what the feminist best known as boobquake girl, Jen McCreight, has called that tired, free thought blog, group and has decided to leave them for her betterment.
Still uncertain on Friday was precisely how the court’s decision would be carried out. Among the 6,000 black candidates who sought jobs, 111 of them — it is unclear for the moment which ones — will be given jobs after receiving physical tests and training.
Maurice Gartshore (Scotland) – Mother Icarus
A No10 spokesperson told the newspaper: ‘We are very pleased to be able to showcase British artists to the many visitors from across the world who come to Number 10.I am sure the artwork will conjure up the feelings the country has for Mr Cameron.’
We should give thanks to God for everything. Not just a quick mention that something worked out for us and we are thanking Him in one little snippet and then it never gets brought up again. That is not true thankfulness. We should brag about what God did for us and give Him thanks. Not just a quick snippet in Sunday school or church bible study. If true repentance is more than saying I am sorry, like is preached in most churches. Then true thankfulness is more than saying “Thank God”. We should let our thanks be heard and be passionate about giving thanks.
Animosity also arises against the few LGBT members of the society, with lines being drawn along religious lines in SIEGE. A contingent of the survivors is convinced the zombocalypse is God’s judgment on the earth and believe the LGBT members of the fort should be evicted. During the heated discussion, many different viewpoints are expressed by various characters. I remember one reader, who is a lesbian, being hurt by the words of Peggy, a character she loved. That particular scene was probably one of the hardest I wrote, but I felt it was something that could occur and couldn’t get ignored.
9/14: Boston, MA @ Paradise Rock Club *
cid:CADA1B34-F285-45EE-8D26-61033EABF049
Third Smart Solutions™ : Be known for your conversation. Employers don’t like drama! Leave your personal life outside the door. Be known for what they are paying you to do. Don’t be known for controversy, office gossip and scandal.
After an exciting yet tiring day of exploration, I want nothing more than a pleasant dinner and a comfortable bed. But when you're on a budget roadtrip, as Mr. Noodle and I were, such small pleasures can prove to be tall orders. For every dish of savory posole at a hidden gem of a restaurant in New Mexico, there is a bowl of microwaveable udon noodles from the Walmart just off a Nebraska interstate highway. For every bed & breakfast suite with a tranquil view of a moonlit Colorado mesa and a serenade of muted calls from wildlife in the distance, there is a ground-floor motel room with curtains tightly drawn against prying eyes and walls too thin to muffle the ecstasy of an amorous couple next door.
This is the original recipe, you may adjust the rice vinegar, sugar and salt according to your own taste. This recipe makes a large amount. I halved the recipe and got three bottles as per the photos above.
Thank you for being there when I need you.
Can’t wait for Day 3!
Beyond the job hunt, I’ve had to practice extreme patience with my social life. Being new to an area and having limited friends means you have to be patient while certain buds blossom.
The obsession with Nazi regalia also has a flaw of unselfconsciousness at its heart. No-one would make a major scandal of it if Prince Harry appeared at a party dressed as a Roman legionary or a Mongol or Hun warrior. All of these costumes are associated, indisputably, with robbery, rape, torture and mass murder. If Julius Caesar was to be available today, or Marcus Crassus (vanquisher of the Spartacist rebellion), both would be prime targets for the International Criminal Court. As for Genghis Khan or Attila...'nuff said, guv.
I used the following for this card:
I am relatively happy now.. With myself, at least. No, I dont like my job, but again, I'm good at it and Im proud of that. I have things in my life that keep me happy.. I have better people in my life now.. Yes, I am single, but I dont see that as a reason to be unhappy.. When I find the right person I will just know.. and then Ill be more happy..
Each beautifully decorated bedroom has its own private balcony. The classical style and quality furniture throughout the hoilday rental penthouse creates an elegant yet comfortable atmosphere. The complete kitchen gives you the freedom to prepare your favorite drinks or meals.
This little film comes from a studio that has produced many classic animated fantasies. Walt Disney is responsible for so many films from “Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs” (1937) to “Fantasia” (1940) to “Alice in Wonderland” (1951) and so on, but for my money “Sleeping Beauty” is one of his finest (with 1940′s “Pinocchio” coming in just behind it for this category). “Sleeping Beauty,” in my humble opinion, is Disney’s best princess movie. Maybe that’s because by this time they realized that the princesses they had been doing were not generally multi-faceted, complex characters (aside from “Cinderella,” but her problems were fairly simple and everybody remembers her evil stepmother the best). Princess Aurora is another fairly simple character, but her situation is far more interesting. The wicked sorceress Maleficent (Eleanor Audley…and one of Disney’s greatest villains) vows to murder the king’s daughter before her 16th birthday and so the baby princess is raised in the woods by the three good fairies and her identity is hidden. The three good fairies (voiced by Verna Felton, Barabara Luddy, and Barbara Jo Allen) become the real stars of the film. (I love Barbara Luddy’s voice, I want her to read me stories before bed). The movie never goes into the biology of fairydom, but supposing they have human span lives (they seem to be of different ages among each other) then that means they sacrificed 16 years of their lives to protect this baby because they loved this human king and queen so much. In any event they do sacrifice the use of magic for 16 years and thus are forced to contend with awkwardly living like mortals. The fairies are the ones who put the city to sleep and try to outwit Maleficent and help Prince Phillip rescue Aurora. The sidekicks, who ultimately have much more personality and are more fully realized characters than the given heroes, are the real heroes in this movie. But the film still ends with the Prince and the Princess dancing together in front of everyone while the fairies sit in the sidelines happy to see peace restored…then they quibble over the color of the dress Aurora is wearing. These are complex characters who, although feisty and prone to bickering, embody goodness and compassion. A lot of people cite “Sleeping Beauty” as the best Disney princess movie because the prince actually does something (aka fight a dragon to rescue the damsel in distress), and although that is a good point, I submit that what makes this movie great is the fun dynamic between those three good fairies. Also the villain is pretty awesome and scary.
Thank you to all who entered April 27 Pick. There were THREE Automatic winners this week (those who requested the book four times and I did not note other people asking for that book during those weeks).
In their darkest hour, hunted relentlessly, tormented by treachery and loss, Kahlan calls upon Richard to reach beyond his sword -- to invoke within himself something more noble. Neither knows that the rules of battle have just changed...or that their time has run out.
Cook until the rice and vegetables are very tender, usually about 45 minutes for me, and serve. Be ready for your family tot go crazy, this may be their new favorite dish! A nice time saver is the crockpot. I have used it many times on this dish to make my life easier. I cut up my chicken and place it in the crockpot, fill with water, turn it on low, and go to bed. In the morning I turn it off, put the crockpot in the fridge, and come afternoon nap time it is cool and ready to be picked through. The only downside is that I can’t make enough stock this way, but I just add some water and bouillon when I use the crockpot.
Life is so excessively crazy right now it's hard to think about at length.
Except, of course, their gathering is full of altogether nicer people.
One Star = Walk of shame. I was in last night’s dress, carrying my shoes as I rushed off. I can’t believe I wasted my time on him and pray no one I know sees me.
Like Bonsai, your orientation in the space is tricked and enriched. The perspective induced by Ladder in the Sky When You Die, 2006, forces your eye up a ladder into a small cave. Why we are climbing and the quasi-depressing place we are going are both bound up with portents both physical and metaphysical.
by Kimberly Bea
The religious world is greatly fragmented and becoming more so as the days pass. Many will say that they have received a revelation. They may have a new idea about God’s Word. Some churches encourage the gift of prophecy and prophets are coming out of the proverbial woodwork. A new cult is born. A new church is founded. A new doctrine is spawned.
So GUESS WHAT. No, don't guess, because then I will have to wait for comments that might never come in with guesses that would be probably very not-even-close and I'm not sure that it would be entertaining at all. How about I just write it out and no one guesses? Yeah, that.
I am seriously trying not to buy anything new...except borders, backing or binding for these, until I get some of them finished! Wish me luck!
While holding a freshly-koozied Abita Amber my other brother had earlier told us that he had a taste in his mouth for fried bream. The old folks around here called that fish a patassa, and he was hauling them in as soon as his cricketed-hooks hit the water. Our younger brother and his wife pulled in several more bass.
Here are some ways that it changed my worldview:
I built up these swatches as necessary to show the colours most clearly (up to seven swipes for the 'very sheer' shades, only one swipe for the 'very pigmented' ones) -- see the notes for info on how pigmented each shade is.
Someone searched today on ‘Lorn Pearson Highland Fling’ and got to my blog… well… it took place yesterday (Saturday 28th April) but I didn’t do it.
So, yesterday we got out last W-2 and I spent the evening doing our taxes and Hubby's FAFSA forms. Such fun! I had to do 2 different ones for Hubby since he has the summer session which qualifies for the 2010-2011 school year, and then next year- 2011-2012.
If you decide you want in, please, use my custom URL. If three of you sign up, I’m guaranteed a spot…which means you are guaranteed coverage of the Beta on this blog!
1. Train Appropriately
I've started doing the survey sites again. Stopped before Christmas because you just seem to sit there for aaaages and a lot of them are so repetitive or screen you out after you've sat there for 20 minutes filling in the damn thing. It also seems to take an age for any points you earn to be credited to your account. BUT when they finally do get credited, I reckon I've done a tenners worth this week which means at some point in my life (hopefully soon!) I'll be claiming a £10 Amazon voucher. And if you read my post last week, we all know what I'll be buying don't we.
3/4 c. sugar
“Another freedom fighter is dead. Another soldier of the Republican Army has passed on. Another name has been added to the long list of British army victims,” he said.
I have to tell you, picking and choosing a few out of so, so many wonderful blogs is really hard. Last time I chose only blogs that were very new to me. This time, I've opted for the bloggers who consistently visit me and many others, and always make truly sweet, sincere, and/or cute and funny comments. Please take the time to visit these ladies if you don't already. They'll invite you in for a snack, I know they will.
Sunday was laid back for the most part. Dinner at Titaya, so that we wouldn't become hungry on our subsequent emotional journey, then off to see Morrissey at Bass Concert Hall. Of the times I've seen him, this was the most aggressive and rocking. Didn't tear up for "How Soon is Now?" like the first time, but it was certainly affecting. Would have liked more early solo work, but I'm not going to argue. Thanks to Mybloody for getting tickets and this setlist.
I'm well aware that as a journalist I should be an absolutist, and as an American I fully subscribe to the notion of the robust marketplace of ideas and all that. But I think these are difficult questions. It seems pretty obvious that Jones is trying to incite...if not violence, then at least rage, and that there's not one redeeming social quality to the act.I disagree. Firstly, I don't think Jones was trying to incite violence anymore than he was trying to prove that the violence is inherent in intolerant strands of Islam. How reasonable is it to murder people over the burning of a book, however sacred? Is human life not holier? We should be able to apply our judgment to the question without being forced to accept an answer that is contrary to all that we believe in.
Memories of time in the field with my amazing subjects, watching, studying, and on the rare occasion, interacting with them, are some of the richest most cherished memories of my life.
* God does promise you pleasures forevermore when you choose to place yourself in
Give them Lockdown. And guess what? There are thoughts and feelings and emotions, but they are wrapped up in a nonstop breathless reading experience. And there is a lesson or two. Either, "don't do the crime if you can't do the time." Or, it's OK for guys to show emotion by crying, especially when they are tough, strong criminals wrongfully accused of murder who are thrown into prison and have to witness other inmates eaten by out of control dogs.
We started hanging out, again.
Well, I’m not the head chef and bottle washer for the time being so regurgitated chicken patties, corndogs and frozen meat pies are starting to creep back into the freezer again. Buddy never was a cook. It takes him 5 minutes to butter a slice of bread (he does a thorough job!) and with all the rest of the stuff he’s up to he can’t think ahead long enough to prepare anything. Tish never did like to cook and to give her credit she does really well at the stuff she does. But she’s busy too with the day zooming past her like a rocket so I can’t blame her for picking up the odd prepared frozen supper.
This kit is filled to the brim with papers and a variety of embellishments for scrapbook layouts, but also for cards and December Daily pages (if you're completing one this year).
AHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAHAHAHAHAHAAHAHAHHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAHAHAHAAHAHAA
Yesterday I told you about some digital stamps I found at Fresh Brewed Designs. I just love these stamps! So I was coloring these adorable stamps last night and my husband came up with a sentiment for them! Oh was he proud of himself! Every time I think about how tickled he was with himself I laugh. So here is my card.
On the other hand, it's possible to bring inspiration to the time we do have. To a degree, we can invite the muse. It might be a matter of paying attention to what works. If it's the feel of wind on your face, go outside. It could be a particular music or a scent or a passage in a book.
Nigeria is of course rightly proud of this archaeological discovery, showing a high level of culture in the Neolithic era.
Today the frontier is space and the boundaries of human knowledge. Sometimes, when we reach for the stars, we fall short. But we must pick ourselves up again and press on despite the pain. Our nation is indeed fortunate that we can still draw on immense reserves of courage, character, and fortitude — that we are still blessed with heroes like those of the space shuttle Challenger.
I am pretty sure the recipient will really enjoy receiving this card - she lives in one of the sunny states of the US, so the light feel of this card should fit right in on her windowsill !
36 calling (or colly) birds,
I wanted to toss rose petals with it, but the rose bush didn't cooperate. And I couldn't think of any pink salad ingredients, besides salmon, so the salad ended up red and white.
A. Most of my books are biographies, so my process begins with figuring out who to write about. Since Gary also writes biography, this is something we talk about a lot!
rested
Then there was the neighbor boy that was texting until 11. I finally had to text him and tell him to say goodnight.
Azmin’s comment that the Dataran did not belong to DBKL was not only reported by the Star but highlighted several times on Twitter by Umno Youth chief Khairy Jamaluddin.
and everyone else i know
The village used to be known as simply “Crendon” but during the English Civil War, to avoid confusion with nearby Grendon that village had “Underwood” added, and Crendon gained a “Long” a remark on the ribbon development that is still in evidence today. In the 13th century Crendon and Aylesbury were the only two settlements in England where sewing needles were produced, also in the village is the excellent 15th century Manorial courthouse now under National Trust ownership and open to the public. More recently Laurence Olivier and Vivien Leigh had their marital home here.
I am enjoying being a blogger and blogging is taking up most of my time. My blog is much more important to me than school, which may not make sense. However, my blog is my main focus.
In the first room, a lady looks at our paperwork and tells us that our 340 Euro fee has increased 9 Euro so we must now go to the Tabac shop around the corner and purchase a 9 Euro stamp.
From VT:
Descend with broad-winged flight,
“I fell down. When it looked like I was going to faint, they stopped hitting me.”
I am very grateful to have met the lovely women in the sisterhood group and participate in The Daily Sisterhood.
and sells Real Change newspapers for $1
selling sweaters while it’s snowing hard
*Hot glue gun
It was fun. :)
Y17
After unwrapping the gorgeous equipment, I started corrupting it. Most Mac enthusiasts (fantatics?) would call it the abomination, OUTRAGEOUS! even. However, I'm not one to be playing with a Snow Leopard, you could lose a finger or worse. Being an MS Windows gay, and having been for about 15 years it's not easy to change, and you know what they say. A leopard can't change its spots, or something to that effect. Anyway, it proved pretty easy to violate the sanctity of the Snow Leopard, and my MacBook is now dancing with the devil.
P.S. Kristina, the cut off age of 43 was the one that I chose. My counsellor wanted me to go up to 45, but I just wasn't feeling that optimistic that day. I reserve the right to change my mind, though!
2005 - Athabasca University
The Eagles Defense has given up as many points as the woeful Redskins have. They will not be able to stop our running game because Eli will keep them honest. If they dare Eli to beat them, my Dude will make them pay...then..Jacobs and Bradshaw will make them suffer.
5. “You can go back 500 years. You cannot find a more audacious plan. Never knowing for certain. We never had more than a 48 percent probability that he was there.” – Vice President Joe Biden at a fundraiser in New Jersey on the decision to kill bin Laden (March 2012)
One thing I love about banana bread is the ever-moistness that you get from the mashed fruit, which really helps with favorable impressions.
However, physical destruction is not the only truth about wars. Indeed, the logistics of a military assault is a miniscule part of the organism that is birthed by war. What stays etched forever in survivors are the deaths, either physical or metaphorical. These are the wounds that never heal, and they alter our realities forever. The pain of losing those dearest to us, of our ways of life, begins to unravel our center. Everything that we use to orientate ourselves and to identify with for the sake of clarity and stability disappears within few weeks, and we are left with the fragments of ourselves, alone and destitute.
Sometimes as an artist, one feels confined and just simply needs to get out and make something beautiful and channel some artistic expression. The process of being spontaneous can spark new thoughts and ideas and often lead to creating something great.
Content guidance: Suitable for readers aged 15 and over. Sexual scenes are suggestive as opposed to explicit. Some references to psychedelic drugs.
As a set it is impressive and all that is seemingly missing is a bank of floating candles (and a roof to the build, to complete it. Although still large, as with many actual sets it is smaller than perhaps you might imagine it, not that this takes away from any of the magic of being there, from seeing the fireplace, the never ending house tables and at the end clothed mannequins standing in the very spots where Dumbledore, Snape and Haggrid once ‘stood’.
The FIREBALL RUN Adventurally is a national live event, covered by the media, streamed online and filmed as part of a documentary film series. Brand placement within the production is mentioned in press releases for immediate exposure, streamed online and posted to social media for tertiary exposure, as well as filmed for later release as part of the documentary film for perennial exposure.
I'll just come down from my soapbox now. This is probably -- probably -- all I'll say on the upcoming election and politics in general. And, no, I won't argue with you in my comments section.
Ferry & Train Reservation
All of those considerations being said my recommendation would be this: study abroad sophomore or junior year of college. However, if you can’t do that it is still well worth doing as a senior, even if it is the last quarter of your academic career. Living with a host family, living in a new culture, exploring a new natural environment, and seeing how another country approaches environmental issues was all incredibly invaluable. It was an irreplaceable experience that gave me an understanding you can’t get from a textbook or in a classroom. The study abroad was a suitable end to my undergraduate career that revealed the on the ground realities of environmental issues in a way nothing else could. So again, if you can at any time for any reason studying abroad will transform your education and your life.
Initial reports indicated that Chen had left the embassy today after Chinese politburo officials ensured his safety in a deal struck with the U.S. State Department. But later, while receiving treatment at a hospital for injuries he sustained during his escape, Chen told the Associated Press that government authorities had threatened to kill his wife if he did not leave the safe haven of the American Embassy.
Naomi screamed at the muffled voice. So close. In her face.
Fact; I’m finished typing. ;D
GLAUDINA: Three incidents on farms in a week.
Send this letter to Fifa
The 'others' I met are a diverse bunch of people who have stunned me with their awareness, kindness, intelligence, humour, spirituality and compassion ( yes, You Guys) who's loving support I have felt and treasured from across the miles that separate us, and I have also made some deep personal friends along the way.
Some people and reviews have dismissed this movie for its lack of nuance and superficiality. Maybe the presence of Vidya Balan made us expect a deep and nuanced biopic of a fallen south siren. But once the first 15 odd minutes passed you ought to realize that this aint no Vishal Bharadwaj movie. Whatever depth and insights Milan Lutharia and Rajat Arora had are all up there in the dialogues for every one to hear and understand. Nothing was bubbling beneath the surface, it was all up there in the bombastic dialogues revealed in all its ‘women empowerment’ glory. It was less ‘No one killed Jessica’ and more ‘Lajja’, which is the way I prefer my ‘women liberation’ lessons, in its filmy ‘underdog triumphs’ exaltation.
Acknowledging that abundance is all around us unlocks the door to that abundance. You begin to see the world as an abundant place and you stop seeing it as a place of scarcity and lack.
Nikolai Miaskovsky: Cello Concerto, op.66
You may be wondering where the white is in this card since it apprears very vanilla. Well, I stamped my flower on stamper's select white. It's a little hard to tell since I added a rhinstone, but it's there, promise. Thanks for looking!
Non-fiction-storytelling confines itself to giving the reader a logical experience of the probable: the best description possible of how things actually are or were. Fiction-storytelling offers an imaginative, affective experience of how things might be, or may have been. Our minds' neural pathways can't tell the difference between an imagined experience and a real one, and so fiction also tells its tales "as if" they really happened, to give us the experience of other lives and worlds. You could say that fiction offers us the memories we don't have ourselves. And in her essay about her novel Alias Grace, which is based on a true story, Margaret Atwood says this:
1 desks
Andd the puppy I want:
Along with our family's fast food habit, I have a morning Starbucks addiction. I've never calculated the cost of this habit, mostly because I know how ridiculous it is to spend $5 on a drink almost everyday (and at least 15min in an outrageously long drive thru line). So, here it is, my iced venti chai tea is $5 per day at 5 days per week = $1,300 per year. Really, I should hide my head in shame. That's crazy.
Good morning Sweet Stampers! We obviously picked a popular theme last week, judging by the record number of entries -and what fabulous entries they were! I keep a notepad with my potential Spotlight winners beside the computer to help me make the final selection and it's no exaggeration to say that my list extends over a couple of pages this week!
This week marks two years since of the passage of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, and if the Obama administration has chosen to all but ignore the second anniversary of Obamacare, the rest of us should pause and reflect on just what a monumental failure of policy the health-care-reform law has been.
In all there were two thousand copies of this recording pressed and released. One thousand were sold through the original pressing in the spring of 1973. Spirit Records cut another one thousand pieces in a re-release several years later.
Months and months later I got an email from a stranger. I found out later he was an editor for Wikipedia, working on an article for something called "nurdles." Pre-production plastic pellets. It seems that those tiny white beads are the foundation material for all things manufactured out of plastic, be it your car's dashboard or the bottle that holds your bleach. Plastic things come from nurdles, and he wanted to use the image. I said "Sure!" thinking that it'd be kind of cool to have a tiny piece of the internet staked out with my name on it, and that little bit of virtual real estate had nothing to do with an epic fail or pr0n or anything. Nice.
Dear Bialetti Espresso Maker:
“You’re not Miss Lanna!” came the voice with a growing sense of alarm.
It doesn’t matter what style of riding you do, or what school of horsemanship you follow – you can experience unconfidence. The good news is that it also doesn’t matter what style of riding you do or what school of horsemanship you follow – you can rebuild your own confidence.
Its spring here,but dont talk about the weather its raining and raining.Am craving for some homemade pickles to get rid of this nasty weather, i wanted to give a trial for a instant version of pickle with some fresh zucchinis, for my surprise its tastes absolutely prefect. Quite similar to those crunchy mango pickles, though this pickle is an instant version, you can make it anytime. This pickle stay prefect for more than two days in room temperature if you conserve them in air tightened box.An excellent side dish for curd rice and rotis.Sending to Kalyani's Pickles & Preserves Fest.
And that is the point of this blog, I guess. And that is why more teachers should blog or share.
Tonight its "Anywhere I lay my head" - a Tom Waits reference, and entirely appropriate.
Here are the JetPens notes for the Pilot Symmetry:
yey me! :) thank you for everyone and for your support for following my blog...
Whisk the milk, vanilla and egg together.
Imperial Bedrooms is a short book, particularly by Ellis’s recent standards. True, the gestation period was not as long as that for Glamorama or Lunar Park (seven years apiece) – but five years to produce 168 pages? My immediate fears were of a Beatrice and Virgil-style car-crash of a book, but the reality is not that bad (not quite).
Now it’s fair to say there are those—and the commenter mentioned above may be among them—for whom a fixation of that sort is readily confused with hope. It may even be that it’s the closest thing to hope that some of them have left. Still, it’s not actually hope in any meaningful sense of the word. To understand why, we’re going to have to take a hard look at just what hope is.
It’s no frontrunner for a gold statue, but it fulfills all the basic requirements for a plot-driven and not stupid two-hour cruise on the Love Boat. Add in Woody Harrelson as a gay sportswriter and…ding, ding, ding…you’ve got yourself a chick flick winner, folks.
'Well,it was OK..but don't you think its a very limited menu?'
Most rooms(‘cabins’) are steerage size too, with bunk beds and little elbow room. Shared bathrooms are down the narrow corridor. If the hotel were to go under in a flash flood of the neighbouring Hudson River, we wouldn’t all make it to the life boats. For any concerned about this remote possibility, larger ‘Captain’s cabins’ with ensuites are also available.
Jack looks down at me, for what seems like the longest second ever all movement stops. There is a little flicker in his eyes and for a second I see the man I fell in love with. The man who brought home flowers after work, the man who’d ask for forgiveness, the man who speaks of our future together, the man who was looking forward to the wedding this fall.
so with Jorden being such a good trooper,
SU Black Ink
What about the next governor? If Spitzer leaves, he'd be replaced by Lieutenant Governor David Paterson. Here's a New York Observer profile of Paterson, which described him as having "a complicated relationship with the truth." Then again, it's as unlikely he's as driven by ego as Spitzer, which suggests he's more amenable to compromise.
i pray you have a glorious blessed beautiful
Merely browning or pan-frying the pork will not bring out the real flavour of this dish. You need to deep-fried the pork in hot oil till golden and crispy. Hot oil is essential to give it a crispy coat and seal in the precious meat juice, so that later you will not be biting into tough pieces of meat. Next, stir fry the side ingredients over high heat, pour in the mixed sauce (cook the sauce briefly) and finally toss in the crispy pork to coat the pieces with that savory sweet and sour sauce. What you need now is a bowl of hot rice.
When you start looking at cheesecake recipes, you could just go wild. Some are so rich with chocolate and/or fruit syrups, tangy and fruity using all sorts of tropical fruit, as I've done in this case. Topping the cheesecake with jelly adds another flavour and sets the fruit nicely. I placed the kiwifruit on oh so carefully on the cheesecake and when I slowly poured the jelly on, off they went. Floating all over the cheesecake.
Spinal Decompression (is an expensive therapy) - BUT, I found an inversion table on sale (and a floor model) at walmart for under $80.
I will re-take pics again, but for now, here is a pic - try to look past the shadow on the wall!
Good for you, Dan Savage: you despise Jesus Christ and Christianity and the Catholic Church as much as your Democrat Party and your war-on-religion president.
4. Taste.
A further piece of irony is that we are lengthening the arm of the State at the very time when China and India are continuing to liberalise economically, when parts of Africa are liberalising, and when even Cuba is showing signs of liberalisation.
Logically, if someone is paying good money for props to an iconic show that is built on solving a mystery, I had hope that the pages Jooky22 acquired weren't just torn out pages of old irrelevant books and such, just to fill up the "desk set" and/or fill up a bag.
now to the prize.
Also, if anyone lives in Virginia or near Washington DC, please let me know of some of the great things we should do while we are living there, share some of the great places to shop and eat. I would love to learn more about our new home, since I won't be able to do a house hunting trip before we move out there.
Speaking of which, John Carpenter’s pure horror talents have never been more taut or focused than in this film. It’s the perfect blending of paranoia, creepiness, gory horror, tension, and suspense. Nobody does it like John Carpenter, and only from his expert direction could this film have become as timeless and consistently effective as it has become. Also from him comes a perfectly selected cast fronted by Kurt Russell as R.J. MacReady – the cool and rational mind, the level-headed one of the bunch. Also featured in this ensemble are Keith David, A. Wilford Brimley, Thomas Waites, Richard Dysart, Richard Masur, David Clennon, Charles Hallahan, Peter Maloney, T.K. Carter, and Donald Moffat. They all inhabit their characters so distinctly and vibrantly. Each man has their own look, and aren’t easy to mistake one for another. Their personalities and characteristics set them all apart very nicely, and all of the cast grasped onto the growing paranoia excellently. A beardless Brimley brings forth a fantastic performance as well as Blair flips out partway through the movie tearing apart the communications center. He plays crazy to immensely entertaining effect. Later, he is truly unsettling leading into the film’s climax. Keith David is constantly entertaining as the gung ho, take-no-crap from anyone Childs. However, Russell clearly remains the most central protagonist of the film bringing stability to the chaos, and handling all the various dimensions of MacReady awesomely.
But how do you find out? In every team you have some clever folks, who manage perfectly to make you doing their job over and over again. It’s up to you to stop it and to lead them to find answers, content, links,.. themself. Just stop – smile – remind them on when or where they should have paid attention.
But as Peace Corps volunteers this is sometimes our reality. Loneliness is a constant struggle, an internal one. Even surrounded by loving friends and neighbors I still miss home. Loneliness is certainly inevitable. We fight it with denial, humor and skype. It can be fought locally, through extroversion, but all the locals in Bonga can’t rid it entirely. Rather, we have to embrace it. Our collective loneliness is our identity. It is what gives returned Peace Corps volunteers a sense of calm. We understand ourselves because we were stuck with ourselves for so long. We can appreciate people more because we’ve missed them so much. We’ll come home with more appreciation, more love, and more understanding. I’ll be a better friend, a better brother, a better boyfriend. We’ll appreciate our mothers and ice cream. We’ll appreciate our friends and public water fountains.
Hola, Epk here with another anime installment!
And I wonder if somehow I am at fault, as they claim, that in trying to bring them up as strong independent characters I have taught them to be dispassionate, unsympathetic and unfeeling towards others. Or if nature truly is stronger than nurture for all of them at times act very much like their father, putting themselves first and foremost, leaving little for anyone else.
And may you see the prosperity of Jerusalem all the days of your life.
Add the corn, chipotle peppers, turkey, broth, and tomatoes. Season with salt and pepper. Bring to a boil, cover, reduce heat to simmer. Simmer for about 10 minutes, or until carrots are tender.
Wolf Kahn has owned sexy neon garishness for decades. And he's not even ironic about it.
Some such as The Spirit Of Geneva (1932), in which the dove of peace is sliced dead by a bayonet, have become iconic. First produced in protest at the shooting of demonstrating workers in Geneva, home of the League of Nations, he reused the motif in East Germany under the slogan Never Again in 1960 and with a poem for peace in 1967.
The name Rose comes from french, Rose perrinial flower shrub or vine of genus rosa in Rosaceae family that contains over 100 species and comes variety of colours.
So today, let's take religion. A recent Gallup poll posits that nearly one-third of the people in the U.S. believe the Bible is to be taken literally. I perceive that number to be big, and it's actually down 10 percent from a peak in the 1980s. The poll shows the unsurprising trend that belief in a literal interpretation of the Bible declines as educational attainment increases.
No, friends, greed is no virtue, but a myth of a materialistic age. It is childishness, wanting every day to be Christmas. And, until the bill is paid in full, I’m afraid we’re in for more horrors.
I wish I could give you
Few months back, my first thing after logging on to my system was blog hopping and leaving comments. But past few weeks, running like a headless chicken i couldn’t do any of my favorite things.
A project is brewing in my head and, of course, I will share it as things come together.
to make the nacho topping (enough for 8 servings):
"1. A method of making a telephone call from any available telephone, comprising: obtaining a special code by making a prepayment; inserting the prepayment in a memory in a special exchange and being allocated to the special code in the memory for use in verifying a calling party call; dialling the special exchange when a telephone call connection is desired; inputting the special code for verification; inputting the number of called party; verifying at the special exchange by checking the special code and comparing the prepayment less any deductions for previous calls in the memory with the minimum cost of a call to the called party station; connecting the called and calling parties' stations in response to said verification; monitoring the remaining prepayment less deductions for the running cost of the call; and disconnecting the call when the remaining prepayment has been spent by the running cost of the call.
any more or at least at that moment.
Reading back through some recent posts, I had a few thoughts that seemed to be worth sharing.
Now, let's learn how to make the Korean spinach.
8. Cheick Tiote (Newcastle United)
My current favorite is the bejeweled Agapostemon, Jade Bee
Oprah Winfrey travelled to Auschwitz in 2006, accompanied by Holocaust survivor Elie Wiesel. Oprah said: “I feel a sense of communion with the spirits of those who died and those who survived to bear witness. I have never felt more human.” – (Oprah Winfrey, Auschwitz, January 2006.) Well Oprah, my dear queen, have you then no communion at all with the spirits of those who have died in the South African Genocide? Is there a difference between the Auschwitz spirits and the White South African spirits, or are you patiently waiting for the number of killings to increase before speaking out?
He declined to give a breathalyzer test, according to the report, adding, “I didn’t realize I hit somebody. (I) pulled into the next stop … I had the runs, I had to go.”
Although so far I have to wait to get a turn. Seems they all like the Wii.
I’ve been to two T20 games at ANZ stadium this year. A Sydney Thunder game that was rain effected but that drew 30,000. And last nights blockbuster international. Both events were really enjoyable. In fact, I walked out last night thinking it can only be a good thing if we see more international cricket at Homebush.
For Father's Day, I surprised Jackson by singing a song for him at church with a slide show of pictures of him and the girls playing. He is such an amazing father that I wanted to honor him with this tribute! Jackson is an incredibly hard worker. He gets up at 5am every day, works all day, comes home then most evening works out on our new house. Even though his To Do list is incredibly long and he is incredibly tired, he still makes sure that he spends time with the girls.
Saturday: ?
Lee Gak decides that they should go see the witness this instant so the Joseon F4 Rangers heads out the palace. (Wait. Did that turtle head looking thing just moved? Creepy.)
Wendy LeSage, animal control officer, said a man who lives in Bondsville has been threatening cat owners since last year that he will shoot their cats if they enter his yard to defecate or go after the birds he feeds, but she is not sure if he is behind the shootings.
I met Sandy, a Wal-Mart greeter, last year. At Christmas she shared with me the cross her family is bearing daily. Please pray for them.
Do not lead people with unrealistic dreams without warning them and preparing them against the most urgent most immediate threats to their very lives. Having dreams and ideals of secession and self-determination without even having considered the possibility of mass genocide is ignorant, foolish and irresponsible, it is a sin in any religion.
Dear Arizona Heat,
These are not the prayers that win contests. They may not even be prayers that get us through the night, or day. It felt futile to offer the darkness to God, over and over, but it was all I could do. Or at least I thought it was.
of teachers!
Knowing the problems with crumbs, they painted their progress instead. They’d started with brushes, bristling with horsehair. When all the hairs were gone, they’d used the wooden handles. When these were ground to stumps, fingertips alone were left.
Here it is:
- Taxi from Sagrada Familia to Las Ramblas 6 euro
Season tilapia with 1/2 tsp salt; place 1 fillet in center of 1 half of each piece of foil. Sprinkle each fillet with 2 tbsp lemon juice and 1 tsp capers.
“It felt great, actually. When I landed back in England there was a message from Simon, saying ‘Hello, Cheryl. So, now that you’ve blown me up in Afghanistan, can we talk?’ I’m not one of those people who holds a grudge”, Cheryl tells GQ.
Make coffee or tea
P.P.P.P.P.S.
Credit Bureau Contact Information Equifax
I've made a circle shape card with George and Basic Shapes Cricut cartridge at 4", and three different snowflake images cut with my cricut machine.
Sliced white bread - 10
ZNY CCCCC ZZH
And there was more jazz to come on the streamlined and sophisticated "Debut", Björk's rebirth as a mainstream artist, issued around the world in July 1993. In fact there was more of everything on "Debut": house rhythms, a 20-piece Indian classical orchestra and Arabic influences - a multi-cultural work of music, no less, through which Björk appears as wide-eyed and exuberant as she was on her first solo album back in 1977. With the pace of her new success obliging a permanent move to London, it appears as if the first 17 years were only just the beginning for Björk. "I've come a long way," she said recently. "Much of it has been in Iceland, but here it's just the same. Only a hundred times bigger."
A Tribute to Ardis James, through July 29.
I don’t want to bore the non-parent with details as to how it is done. Actually I do. Basically, you let the baby associate the fresh air on their privates with elimination. The baby learns not to pee when he’s clothed. Send a self-addressed stamped envelop with £5 or $8 to Lewis Schaffer, “That Crazy Dad”, Nunhead and I will email you how it’s done.
The book was intricately descriptive. The painful foot binding that Lily endured was so vivid, that I actually ripped off my own shoe while reading because my foot started to hurt! The author’s vast knowledge of culture provided the perfect platform for a story that questions a woman’s worth in a male dominated society. Told as a memoir, the flashback perspective enriched the book by allowing the author to comment on her own actions with the wisdom only age can bring.
4 went
Beside me Adie – Adrianna – had ordered a poncey-sounding chicken liver parfait in a warm marsala coulis. I’d laughed as she read it out from the menu but when the dish actually appeared my heart fell. It looked bloody gorgeous. We all drooled at the sight and moved in closer. Adie let each of us
MLA: Is the growth in the foods’ business mainly a result of inflation?
WINDOW ART
1 onion chopped
Taking place in a nondescript corner of New York City, a student in a green army jacket named Alex Carmichael (Robert C. Sabin) is on the lookout for a new apartment. Standing in front of an equally nondescript building, Alex and his denim-adorned girlfriend Lori (Mary Huner) are shown "a lovely apartment" by Ruby (Bunny Levine) and Lizzy (Jane Doniger Reibel), two oldish biddies who got their shit together. If you're wondering if Lori is going to be living with Alex in his brand new apartment, you can forget about it; Lori will not be pressured into making a decision regarding her personal freedom without giving it some much needed thought.
pronounced, “Blessed . . . blessed . . . blessed.”
The flowers are made using a punch,the edge punch is from stampin up,the ribbon is from meiflower crafts,the sentiment is from the computer.
Molly
Pharmacists are the most accessible health care providers. Pharmacists can provide basic health screenings for blood pressure, high cholesterol, and diabetes. Many community pharmacists are trained to give flu, pneumonia, and shingles immunizations. Pharmacists are trained to triage many patient self-care needs and if asked can provide recommendations for treatment that prevent a trip to the doctor. More patients are educating themselves about the services that pharmacists provide but many are unaware of the disease state management services pharmacists provide.
Herbs
So what do you have to do this wk? Well we are having a monochromatic theme which means making a project using shades of one colour. Of course we allow hair and skin colours if you have an image but the project should really feature only shades of one colour to be a true monochromatic creation.
“No, Saarah, “Lentils”, with an “L”.”
Put down the placards, start in with the emails and phone calls, and get organized in your locale to pick up the vital concerns of regulating and putting in place the safeguards for life that are currently taken for granted and, thusly, not there. This means working at the State and local level to address issues close to you and find those willing to help you organize beyond your location and come together on this vital concern.
In 2008, I had life pretty good. I was running my own IT company that I had started with a business partner in 2005, we were hoping it would take off and make us lots of money. And when it wasn’t, I started really doubting myself. My inside voice (my Inner Fiend) kept calling me a loser, told me the company wasn’t succeeding because I wasn’t good enough. My business partner kept talking to me as if our lack of success was all because of me and I wasn’t being successful selling enough. In hindsight, I realize that he wasn’t really talking to me that way, but that is how I was interpreting it. I was responsible for all the failures. I never stood up for myself, I just kept trekking along hoping things would improve, but they never really did. And then I got sick, with rheumatoid arthritis.
It’s hard for me to believe that it was a year ago that I just tried something on a whim after seeing results about six months prior. I never quite imagined that I would be where I am today.
Peter Gade and Lee Chong Wei will meet in a now classic match in the Premier Super Series final on Sunday, where local hopes will be alive with two shots at gold, in the mixed and women’s doubles.
But amidst this change, we are letting go of all of the junk we have grabbed onto along the way that was never intended for us. Isn't that an amazing thought? God gives us exactly what we need? How much of what we have is not what we need? But rather, what we think we need? This, I am convinced, is where the overwhelming feeling comes in. The frustration. The feeling of never having enough time to go around.
Ok, it is that time of year where Gingerbread house kits start popping up everywhere, at mung-o-mart, shop-o-ramas, and get-it-all-greens, so I can't resist them, but don't want to buy it either, so I decide to go all natural this year ~ yep, you heard me~ ALL NATURAL! FROM SCRATCH... (du..du.. du...)
When you think of weatherizing your home, you might be thinking you have to spend a fortune on windows, door and insulation. If you have the money to do that, that’s great. But for most of us on a tight budget, we need to take other steps to find low cost ways to save energy in our home.
Garnets –Jerusalem –early pre- Indian Uprising single.
Not that it stopped them from thinking they were better than anyone else.
Saturday found us at a benefit for my best friend's non profit, which involved fake gambling (i lost), a band called The Booty Shakers, and all around good times. We also trekked across town to Hollywood for my little friend's birthday. And let me tell you, a party for a 23 year old in Hollywood is no fun. parking was 25 dollars, traffic sucked and Mr Matrix and I were not happy. But we managed to stay for 30 minutes take some photos and give the kids some helpful advice ("don't mix that! gross").
In Washington, about 1,280 cases have been reported in 2012, and officials believe the state could see as many as 3,000 cases by year’s end. Health Secretary Mary Selecky declared the epidemic April 3, and since then officials have bought up the vaccine and made it available for free for people who don’t have insurance.
Stepping out to honor.
Saint Louis Brewery / Schlafly Tap Room Schlafly Dry-Hopped American Pale Ale
8- Life As We Knew It by Susan Beth Pfeffer. It’s about the end of the world, what’s not to like? Seeing the asteroid hit the moon, and the crazy chaos that ensues…it might not be summer blockbuster material, but it would still be a cool movie.
whose purity cannot be disturbed.
An older friend tells me the beer used to far stronger than the 5% it currently is. Certainly when I last drank it, it was 5.5%. My friend informs me it used to be 6%+ but I have no way of confirming this. If it is not on Google it never happened. Further to this my memory of the beer was one of being a crisp clean pilsner lager with the crisp bitterness you expect from a pils.
"If there’s no advance, there will be very little upside to trade publishing anymore, in my opinion — especially for nonfiction authors who have a platform. If the author can “afford” to complete the book without an advance (and hire their own editor), why not self-publish? Then, instead of waiting for royalties, you take everything after costs.
I'm not sure if my transition really works but I'm happy that I was able to use items in my closet that hadn't been worn in awhile. I'm excited to see everyone's entries!
fingers that point.
As it had to on the white legs disappearing into the green
All costs related to participants’ travel expenses and meals are at participants’ cost.
Then we returned to find that our Kansas Jayhawks have won the Big 12 Championship and are ranked #1 in the nation for the NCAA Tournament. Rock Chalk Jayhawk! Go KU!
I must feed her, me, you: and love
One day the king and his friend were on a hunting expedition. The friend
2010.09.18 Iran Iranshahr 1 0 Jundallah (Soldiers of God) kidnap a civilian and kill him during a rescue attempt.
Bottom line: Blackface=dressing up in a stereotypical costume of a race that is not your own, drawing upon a history of racism and inequality. Playing Indian=dressing up in a stereotypical costume of a race that is not your own, drawing upon a history of racism and inequality. Clear enough for you?
#35 Fa la la la Felt by Amanda Carestio (Read 27/03/2012) Yes, another craft book. Another felt craft book. Some of these are just lovely, simple to make and very festive. I’ve copied a few patterns and started cutting out. Yes, I know it’s April. And these are Christmas patterns. I have nothing further to say on the topic.
Nightly homework requires 20 minutes of reading, and his teacher strongly recommends that he try reading all genres, including non-fiction. Thus, at the library, I checked out a short book on Christopher Reeve. My son couldn't put it down and read till he had finished (long past the timed 20 minutes). Every mother's dream, no?
PARASITIC WASP AND HUMPBACKED FLY
She's Rupert Abbott's wife.
But also I think it's because they are so fleeting. Their lives are so short, and so tied to the seasons -- the first butterfly is the truest harbinger of Spring. And caterpillars are so accessible. They are easy to find (in their season), and they will crawl all over your arm and tickle you and you can watch them munch leaves.
When overwhelmed it is easy or more natural to turn to God. Though sadly some turn away from God. We need to hold on to the faith, to hold on to faith. We need to come to God in and through Jesus. And we need to recall truth from scripture. Also we need to share our struggle with a trusted friend who can give us good counsel and pray for us. I most often share my struggles with my wife, Deb. And I also share them with our pastors, Jack and Sharon. And maybe some other friends, here and there.
If you're reading this, these products are not intended for you, but they may be intended for someone close to you. They're for people who want to belong to a particular brand family but who don't like straight whiskey.
Surprisingly, though, the sun came out for a few hours to brighten the day.
Add this to cool dye bath on stove top, no lid. Turn on heat, 9 I use high) add wool, stir occassionally.
Dan Tsang is also Data Librarian and Bibliographer in Asian American Studies, Political Science, and Economics at the University of California, Irvine, where he organized the Immigrant Lives Exhibit to debunk ‘The OC’ TV image of Orange County. He maintains Subject and Course Guides in fields such as Asian American Studies, Political Science, Economics, and the Social Sciences. He earned his B.A. in Government from the University of Redlands, where Professor Kota Inoue (interviewed in our very first podcast) currently teaches. Dan Tsang went on to earn two graduate degrees at the University of Michigan, an M.A. in Political Science and an M.L.S. in Library Science. As a journalist, Dan has authored numerous articles and opinion pieces, as well as scholarly publications, which you can see listed here. In today’s podcast, Dan mentions Elaine Black Yoneda, a white woman who joined her Japanese American husband in the internment camp. Dan’s biographical entry on her is the last entry in Notable American Women: A Biographical Dictionary Completing the Twentieth Century (Cambridge, MA: Belknap Press, 2004), Vol. 5, 707-709.
In an email to IANS Bapat said: “We were expecting occurrence of a large magnitude earthquake in Indonesia…. We were debating it and the expected time window was about 10 to 15 days.” But it has occurred earlier, he said.
Made of soy, said Sham-I-am.
It’s really quiet.
“……you mean we get to REST?”
I especially loved the exercise regarding writing down a story on the first line you hear when you turn on the television.
I don't like cottage cheese,
It's a concept worthy of Vonnegut (or Mamatas). I wouldn't call this story itself a satire, but it has its satirical moments, its satirical flourishes. Satire can be terribly leaden and unplayful, but here it is infused with whimsy:
Also, in standard hard drive data recovery services, thе service providers wіll determine еxаctlу what data recovery procedures wіll be taken and hоw extensive the damage оn the drive is. After that sort оf identification, thе company уоu hаve contacted will furnish yоu wіth a verbal report аnd thеу wоn't proceed tо the actual data recovery unlеѕѕ you havе not gіvеn уоur approval to proceed. Once уou havе given your approval, the affected drive will be plаced in the job queue and thе data wіll bе recovered in thе order it wаs received.
~ I will be so glad to be done w/ high school. Honestly. It's been great but right now I really wish I was done w/ my dual-enrollment classes. I'm really tired of being the only senior in Spanish class w/ a bunch of sophmores. I'm tired of not having a Bf and going to prom (I am going on a dinner cruise though in May and it will be like prom so I have to get a dress for it...so excited! :) ...and am generally sick of kids who are immature. Granted, I have some awesome friends there- I really do. But I want to move on.
As for what I now use regularly: if I find myself writing a scene where a character mulls, reflects, ponders, or muses - while nothing else happens - I cut it. That's not actually a scene. It's place-holding, or self-indulgence. Out it goes. Back to the action.
As some of you may remember from an earlier blog entry about my rewiring, as a result of developing prostate orgasmic ability my nipples have become extremely erotically responsive. They are almost always in a state of erection. So as she lay there inches from my erect nipple she giggled and said it was amazing how “these little guys” were always sticking out. With the completion of that observation she leaned forward the few inches and closed the gap between my hardened nip and her mouth.
Anyway...race morning. Kelsey got all glammed up in her finest race wear and we met up with her mom (who walked the half marathon as well!).
and crowned him with glory and honor.
To enter, visit Boogie Wipes website and pick your favorite scent. Leave a comment below indicating your favorite. Comments close on Saturday, October 23 11:59 EST. Open to US residents only. Winners must respond within 48 hours of being contacted or winner announcement or another winner will be selected.
Inbali: When I was eleven my family upped sticks and moved from East Anglia to Tucson, Arizona. I hadn’t grown up surrounded by wildlife – in Cambridge, you were lucky to spot a robin or the occasional squirrel. Tucson was different, a city in the dunes, where sun-soaked adventures revealed poisonous lizards, scarlet birds and snakes hunkered down behind rocks. It was in this arid climate that I read about another desert far away, and long ago, and the burnished city of Bubastis in the Nile Delta where cats were worshipped as gods.
1 cup freshly shelled English peas
Automated upon a superdisc levitating in a macro-causal vacuum
An August Sunspot, or an October Chill,
believes he fought and died in Normandy
“No, I’m not.”
Two gawky 16-year-old Cleveland boys Jerome Siegel and Joseph Shuster met in high school. Both boys were from immigrant Jewish families and lived down the street from each other in Glenville, then a booming, overwhelmingly Jewish, middle-class neighborhood, with kosher markets selling Yiddish newspapers on nearly every street corner. At the time, Cleveland was the fifth most populous American city, and a forward-thinking one at that, being the first to install public electricity and trolleys.
On Wednesday I caved and decided to go to the maternity ward at my new
My issue is with myself, for not trying harder, for not making more of the time and the opportunities I had when I was young. I have the genes to be a bookworm that loves quiet indoor life. I think if I magically got to live life over I think I’d trade TV and movie watching for several hours a week of being active outside. I’d still keep books, writing, science and computers – in a do-over I’d just try to find a balance, maybe two-thirds geek and one-third jock, instead of 100% geek.
Other random pics from the last 24 hours or so:
White shirt (v neck with tiny ruffles you can't see) - Goodwill
I like the mix 'n match myself, where the film on one hand looks like a typical sixties comedy that woulda got stuck on the CBS LATE MOVIE sometime inna early eighties yet comes off like a standard generation gap/brainy relevant film albeit not as strong a one as THE POOPIES NEXT DOOR, BILLY HACK or SOLDIER BLUE BALLS. But shocking enough in its own new morality way as were a great number of similar-minded films for the next four or so years that the folks in Hollywood for some reason thought we all wanted to see. A lot of SKIDOO is as ridiculous as you'd expect, though some parts such as the aforementioned Gleason LSD trip scene are about as "there" as the various acid trip experiences in all of those other late-sixties films you've endured lo these many years which might not be saying much, but frankly I'd rather watch Gleason tripping out than Peter Fonda and Dennis Hopper anyday.
I would really recommend house swapping for a holiday!
And it's things like that. I think about them a fair amount. Nearly two years and my grief is very different than it was. I recently re-read the early things, looking for something to send to a newly bereaved mother. And the raw pain that was spilling out here took my breath away. I can remember it, vaguely. Thinking back to that immediate aftermath is always a foggy, cloudy perspective. I remember certain things clearly - we watched hours upon hours of Cash Cab and HGTV. Mindless chunks of half-hour numbness that had no babies. I remember boxes of Ding-dongs. I didn't touch alcohol, but by god, I ate ding-dongs. I remember getting my haircut and that awful moment when my stumbling words made my husband think I wanted a divorce. I remember that I hurt and that I felt blind, but I have no emotional memory of it. I can't feel that pain - and thank god, because who could bear it forever? But re-reading it was like opening a window to it and catching a glimpse of it. Oh yes, that feeling, it was like a hundred small knife wounds. Yes.
It’s a cute song and a great video…make SURE you watch it till the end.
not gonna lie, i've had a pretty craptastic week. and a pretty rotten day today. but man, does this baby girl's smile make my heart explode.
Over to you!
Before we left, Brooklyn pointed to a little girl behind us and said (very loudly) Mom! Look! Baby! Mom, there's baby! Mom! MOM! Look there baby! Look Mom! BABY! I see baby Mom? I play with baby? Mommy! Baby! Over there baby! I play with baby!"
At the press conference, Schiller mocked paper textbooks, saying, “They’re not portable, not durable, not interactive, not searchable.” Books on the iPad are all of those things, he said, according to live blogs covering the event.
so I can put the scepter back in his hands, take the red
This episode of I Hear a New World features a diverse mix of new and used vinyl that I have picked up recently at the Night Owl Record Show and Exiled Records over the past month. Since I have been buying a lot of international music lately, it leans heavily towards this style with a considerable dollop of funk, jazz, spoken work and psychedelic garage rock to even out the flow. Bands featured include Eddie Harris, Erkin Koray, Thee Oh Sees, Ahmad Zahir and Los Destellos.
Now before you get your panties in a bunch, consider the situation if the roles were reversed. Imagine if you’re the only white/ straight/ English speaking/poor/ republican/ single/ fill-in-the-blank-here person in the room. Odds are high that you would have the same issue and try to search the crowd for your likeness. This is the exactly what young girls of color are going through--awkwardly searching for their likeness in the crowded bookshelves.
“Oh, 99-something, I’m fine.”
My Friday so far.
I say the latter because of the fact that I know once I have a certain amount of exposure to social situations, I become an extreme recluse to basically “recharge” myself. I don’t thrive on social outings, they drain me (maybe there’s a psychic vampire following me around? haha). I like helping people and talking to them, but damn, I can only handle so much.
And nobody in the store really questions why I’m there. They know I’ll talk when I’m ready.
The carrots tasted great!
She was summoned by the Hisbah Board, forced to cancel the protest and had to promise never to talk about it again. She was chastened but didn’t give up fighting.
Meagan
Best Bet: Animated Film; Possible: Sound Editing; Long Shot: Visual Effects
About Rob Dyrdek Foundation
She gave the books with no strings attached, but we are immensely grateful for her generosity.
So, I am definelty NOT a gym person...I hate the gym. I have to workout outside, in the fresh air, with an open road ahead of me. Anyhoo, even though I go running alone, I still like to wear cute workout clothes. I was browsing online for some new gear earlier today, and I stumbled upon these at Nordstrom. Who says you can't look great while getting a sweat on?! Bring it!
Fisher Values:
French Dip sandwiches, french fries, mixed fruit
If a girl attains puberty after sunset she will become (or will have a tendency to become) a prostitute
I send a kiss to each of your foreheads :)
that life changing ephiphany cingular to him in a cross county
I believe that red will be one of the BEST colors to use in the Avacyn pre-release. The creatures and the cards are both very aggressive.
(I’m reviewing this now as I don’t want to go straight to episode two, which will be uploaded shortly.)
So I woke up this morning to a bunch of old pictures on my Facebook from my dear old dad.(Is anyone else's 50 something year old dad on FB as much as mine is? LOL)
Cables leak, are you listening?
They should begin with the crafting of poems before they send them off into the world on their own. I tend to think there is a kind of poem that stands more chance of winning in many competitions – poems which are overtly about big subjects, yet are deftly handled. Though a neatly drawn poem about a bird’s flight might win you the National. As Fleur Adcock says in The Prize-winning Poem:
I am still in the chapter on scheduling. I just read a few pages today.
level measures for the effective
So, I cleaned it off with Murphy's Wood Soap (even though I am sure this is not real wood). I took two baskets that were downstairs, full of crap. But that is another story.
2 multiple
Vit A – 515iu/kg
development for disaster management.
Next thing Chaka was pregnant and my friend was playing midwife and nanny and granny to more kittens (2 of which she kept and the rest of which went to her own sister). Now my friend's flawless home was really the territory of 3 gorgeous, young and mischievous cats. But Chaka remained my friend's baby.
If you happen to see the interview, lie to me and tell me I was great.
Though the core objectives do not include attempts to persuade government to act in any particular manner, they do include the demonstration, to government and other interested parties, of the capacity to act in such a manner as to utterly disrupt the normal function of society in Muslim areas, and the inability of the government to do anything to prevent this from happening. This will in turn allow the paramilitaries in question to put a great deal of pressure on government to act in the required fashion later on, when specific actions are required of it.
Not a terrible episode per se, but it just didn’t really add anything. Shitty training montage, any excuse for crappy fanservice and risqué ‘humor’, and Shu whining. A lot. Ok, scratch that, it was a crap episode because it somehow failed to advance anything in the overall plot in any integral way to the episode’s plot and the characters became even more unlikeable and unpleasant. These writers, man, damn. Accomplishing nothing except making us hate the show even more.
Which BBC television series featured Emma Milne as a newly qualified vet?
All in all, this is going to be an interesting and light hearted look at my old career as a resident band drummer and singer. I will throw in some background information to as to how I got roped in to this rather mad and hectic career. I hope to, that you will enjoy reading some of this drivel as much as I, (hopefully), enjoy writing it.
The thing that held Karl up so often usually was the sheer number of choices in a game. Do I move move my piece here or there? Do I build up this skill/tech-tree or another? Do I hold my resources? Do I trade? Do I purchase now? Do I use the power-up or save it for later?
Fleece if you want to stuff your hat, makes it look nice and full.
Linum lewisii (Blue Flax)
This recipe is one I've done, in some form or another, for some time. It's a standard English best bitter. I tweak the hops here and there to try and obtain the beer I've planned in my head - I've not always succeeded, but it's always been a pleasure to drink, and I'm hoping this batch will be no different.
Here it is: White Velvet Matcha cake with Chocolate Italian Meringue Buttercream!
It's not unpleasant or inedible. It just ain't remotely what it's said to be. Perhaps in the USA they have less tolerance for real chili. Maybe we're just being conned. Either way, if you want roaring hot chili that'll rip the roof off - don't bother with this.
Yet like most things which are nobody’s business, one is very curious to know.
“Pretty Girl Rock” – Conjestina
Baby Jesus
The wind was against them and that is why they had to change course. That word “contrary” also means adverse. But God was still on the throne and he was allowing this to happen to show that He was still on the throne.
My hope is that a change in how we view ANZAC Day will spark a wider societal change. To make it unacceptable for the Government to hide from the public what is happening in Afghanistan, or other wars Australians are involved in, except in very limited and exceptional circumstances. To make it unacceptable for a sanitised version of history to be taught in our schools. To make it known that we are a nation desirous of peace and make it known in our nation the realities and costs of war.
Over a longer time span, it is possible for a ship to have a different plank changed every time it comes into port until there is no longer a single piece of wood remaining from the original construction. We see it as the same ship, as an enduring object, and yet it could easily be said that the ship is a process too, not unlike the wave or the flame. The only difference is the time scale.
What do you think of my list of requirements? Whats on your list?
32. Let her roll around in the grass. It’s good for her soul. It’s not bad for yours either.
Emily has been saving for months to earn enough money to buy herself an i-Pod Touch. I’m proud of how hard she has worked doing yard work for relatives and neighbors to earn the money.
Small mixing bowl, for creating sauce
9. A loaded gun, a pair of Dobermans, and an attitude can make anything a lot less creepy.
I don't know how many of you readers have spent time on Indian Reservations, but they're generally not examples of a prosperous people. They are a proud people made wards of the State.
The objective is to help the organization evaluate the effectiveness of the controls implemented and improve the current controls.
To me the music itself conveys alternating moods of joy and sadness. It seems that way and about three quarters through sheer desperation gains prominence until just before the end when the tempo picks up again the mood changes for the last time to a feeling of hope and joy. Well that's how it affects me. Hope you like it.
We've had a stressful year, full of changes, some good, some controversial, some that are hard to swallow and sadly because of it, a lot of the grownups in my school, myself included are not behaving very well either and we then wonder why so many of our kids are having trouble too. The fact is, even the best of friends need a break from each other and teachers are no exception.
Today is Joe's birthday - and it's lent - so looks like it'll be pasta and seafood tonight! .. which is sad for him, b/c he's a chicken guy .. but good news for me, since pasta and seafood are my 2 faves!! .. Plans for dinner might be to try a new Itialian place on the island that we never tried before .. only time will tell what we'll end up doing .. since i'm good for changing plans abruptly! :o) ..
Global-Tech Appliances, inc. v. SEB S.A., No. 10-6, May 31, 2011
and ask yourself, is it because you feel obligated or can you genuinely say is it an easy and happy choice?
“I’ve been one poor correspondent, and I’ve been too, too hard to find, but it doesn’t mean you ain’t been on my mind.”
According to Roman custom, there was a festival in honor of the foundation of Alexandria today, the 23rd of January. The Agathos Daimon was very much connected to the foundation of Alexandria by Alexander the Great, as illustrated by these excerpts from Arrian’s Anabasis Alexandri and from the Alexander Romance. (For that matter, I’d highly recommend looking at the entirety of Neos Alexandria’s Pantheon page on Agathos Daimon!) Given that there is such a connection through Roman practice and observance, it seemed logical to base this observance’s location on it.
“Well, I’m trying to get as much ‘points’ as I can with the Scorpio I’m in love with. Love me?”
I rarely respond to author LL barkat’s challenge to write something about On, In, and Around Mondays, yet this time, in my dazed tiredness, I feel the want to do something productive since all my morning plans have dissolved.
The Philippines’ favorite Bakeshop, Goldilocks is now in Bangkok. News said there will be several branches in Bangkok but yesterday I was trying to locate the one in MBK Centre but even as I go through all the floors, it wasn’t there. It may be open soon.
After two vacations in a row of unusually lousy Florida weather, our activities and weather have been ideal this year. It is unbelievable. I am not sure you would believe me if I told you all the details and I keep pinching myself to make sure I am not dreaming. We have dolphins swimming right up to us while we kayak, and pretty runs on the beach as a family because Maizie's leg is healed. Noodlebug sun bathes on the porch and I am riding a sweet horse. We are in the promised land and I am so very grateful.
Having already picked through this kind of jew-first dissembling and dissimulation with Lawrence Auster (and to a similar but less thorough extent with Ian Jobling, Guy White, Fjordman, and several others) I see hardly anything new here. Yet I'm fascinated by the situation and dismayed by how Unamused faces it. On the surface I see a conflicted man I'm inclined at first blush to feel some sympathy for - a part-jew/part-White who wants to "redeem" his jewish half and prove himself pro-White. Unfortunately I can't help noticing his deception and duplicity. How he goes about trying to achieve his goal by attacking Whites. How he's not simply trying to redeem himself, or half-jews, but all jews because they are jews.
14-16 May Ramallah
Did I mention we move on Saturday?
Sheikh AU, Ernest JM, O’Shea M. Long-term outcome in fetal hydrops from parvovirus B19 infections. Am J Obstet Gynecol 1992; 167: 237-241.
BOSTON, MASSACHUSETTS CNN has a cure for insomina; The Joy Behar Show.
Book Creator does exactly as its name suggests: it creates books (with a little help from the authors, of course.). With Book Creator, you can quickly create a standard or audio iBook that can be read using the iBook App. The amazing thing is that you can pack so many features into a free App. With Create Books, you can add your own illustrations, text, narration, or sound track to your iBook.
When to use: Quote this directly to a nearby fan (any allegiance will do) after a succesful play from your team, taking care to substitute “Homer” and its first syllable with an appropriate name.
I’m not calling life in Viet Nam a valley per se. In fact, life in VN has been a lot sweeter and better in every material, psychological/stress, security point of view than it was in lets say, Congo. But we had been feeling a little blank for a while I think. It’s true, when we’re out of the valley, we don’t need as much. We don’t pray as much. We don’t seek sometimes. But in the last few months, with David’s dad passing, and both of us feeling in a bit of a rut/plateau, we sunk back into the valley. And here we start to thrive again.
The story of Lady Elizabeth Hungerford locked in the tower of Farleigh Castle for four years – and the fact that no one knew how she escaped. It caught my imagination on a visit to the castle and made me want to write a story about it.
along a parade route. Spectators lined both sides from start to finish, and there was music blasting, live bands, a couple of drum lines, dozens cheering, clapping, people spraying the runners with garden hoses and handing out oranges, water, popsicles, ice, etc. I had my iPod, but half the time I couldn't even hear my music over the cheering crowd; hundreds of thousands of people watched the race. It was unreal.
This simple guide can assist you in avoiding a life of crime, punishable by indefinite detainment in the Gulag. The Regime is diligently searching for terrorists and you want to be above suspicion. (Really – you do, because suspicion is all that is necessary for punishment and confinement these days.)
Depending on the condition of your current filing system and a number of warranties you have, this project can take 90 mins or longer.
The child is in elementary school and already knows about hooking a reader. Is that unusual? I'm tempted to say no. Most children, if left to their own abandon, often create spot-on, highly descriptive pictures of an imaginary world. So, what happens to these voices? What happens to one's song? How does it get stifled or, worse, extinguished? Is it one person who undermines our natural ability to express? Or is it a combination of negative experiences?
Maybe it was always like this and I was too happy in my own world to notice. Well, I'm not going outside now until Tuesday, or Wednesday next week. I'm staying in with my laptop, my Harry Potter Dvds and my old favourite pc game, Thief. Good times. Sniffle.... oh and my tissues.
Breakfast: 30g carbohydrates
To make sure my ribbon was in the right place, I put the skirt on my little girl and tied the ribbon around her waist and into a bow. I made sure it was sitting right, then checked where the sides were on the skirt and pinned the sides of the ribbon exactly where I wanted them to fall. This makes the ribbon a bit gappy on the front when it's not on, but it needs that gap to stretch with the elastic when the skirt is on. I pinned two sides and one in the front, then I stitched two lines of straight stitch down the sides of the waistband.
On Monday October 15th 2001 I received an e-mail from a puzzled author who seemed in some distress:
I now use a different technique when colouring her hair so instead of using a circular motion, I use a 'feathering' technique instead. I start with my lightest colours first, so next I use Burnt Ochre, feathering from the edges into the white space...
Things has changed I am talking again with my older brother and my younger brother is back home.
So - those are the things I'll be offering on my site, and I'm very happy to be able to offer them now!
Biedronka does have some good things now (and some bad). I mentioned mature cheese some time ago, which is still there, but my current best buy is cornichons with chilli.
Here we are a third of the way through the book of Acts, watching the early church grow, and God throws off the gloves. Instead of manhandling the attackers of the faith – Jews and the Gentiles – God embraces them and turns the whole game upside down (sorry I was just recently watching hockey). God takes the opposition to the faith and turns them into the propagation. God took Saul (later called Paul) – notorious Jewish bounty hunter – transformed his life on the Damascus road, and used Saul (Paul) to reach the unclean Gentile world with the good news of Jesus and used him to write most of the New Testament. God used devout Gentiles like Cornelius to encourage Jewish men and women who were in need and to show the Jewish Christians that God’s plan was and is much bigger than the nation of Israel. God used these situations to show us His heart – HE LOVES ALL PEOPLE.
Minoura action roller advance wide bicycle trainer well build with high quality materials it was easy to assemble took about 20 minutes. It is a great indoor exercise machine for bad weather. This trainer easy to carry around and folds up easily for storage.Need to train in the winter but don’t like the feel of traditional bike trainers? Turn to the Minoura ActionRoller Advance, which makes indoor training feel as natural as riding on the road.
His total reliance on the apparent ‘character and spirit’ of the squad is widely joked about and embarrassing. Many fans don’t bother to listen to his post match comments because they are just so predictable and lacking any tangible content.
The co-pilot, John Curtis Burn, who broke his back in the crash, fashioned a makeshift raft from portions of the wrecked plane to help keep himself and Froman afloat. After being rescued, they were sent to the same convalescent home, where they battled their long recoveries together. After she divorced Don Ross in February 1948, Jane Froman and John Burn were married, only to be divorced eight years later (March 12, 1948 – 1956).
Then of course I wondered what it would look like with the colours in a different order....
Belief: In most cases, it’s okay to trust people with more than just what the mask shows.
8 Proudfoot, A. (2001) From zero to competence: ab initio ad astra, Subject Centre Grammar Supplement: 15-16, Subject Centre for Languages Linguistics and Area Studies
Mother’s finest dew.
That is a full and happy bag and worth every ounce of dragging it around the city. It's nice to have a choice in the arsenal and good to know that there are writing options as the needs comes up. I haven't given up my electronic friends though...also in my bag are two laser pointers, a stylus, laptop, iPad 2, wireless mouse, Garmin GPS and about 20 GB's of storage. If the Stationary Apocalypse ever comes, I will be prepared.
I spent it at The Paisley Beer Festival, pulling pints and helping the punters drink the foreign bar dry. Many saw the day off as an excuse for an extra days drinking, away from the deferential sychophancy fest that was the blanket TV coverage on Royal Wedding Friday. Paisley Beer Festival was Camra's Big Society in action and hats off to Alesela for saving the day.
For far too long, this has served to suppress an absolutely vital debate which desperately needs to be had.
The metaphorical interpretation is an interesting approach to the problem of Ephesians 5. I am not sure that I could hold an audience long enough to explain such a position with those who expect a quick, two-punch sound bite or proof text. Nevertheless, the interpretation is a useful reminder that texts should not always be taken at face value or as prescriptive when they are just as likely meant to function as literary or as descriptive.
You see, EWI’s global analysts like Whitmer don’t follow the talking heads nor do they rely on fundamentals — both of which can be misleading. Instead, they examine objective evidence and charts — like this one — to deliver crystal-clear, forward-thinking analysis.
- he has a couple more weeks at playlearn and then will be out for the summer before he starts at the new school in august! i can't wait for him to go to the school that i went to as a little girl!!! so special.
If you remember the gun ban during the Clinton administration you know for the most part it was worthless because we had a heads up months before it went into effect and more guns were imported and sold in 6 months than would have been in the next 6 years. Same goes for the 'high cap' mags. During the ban they were available everywhere you just paid more. This was because the ban only effected new imports and manufacture of certain items, personal items you owned before the ban were grandfathered in.
This was my favorite presentation of the year. Combining vintage book images and a decoupage-ish technique - does crafting get any better?
Choose two characters from the story. Make sure they know each other.
Leaders Risk Protector offers Security & Privacy insurance to respond to third-party liability claims arising from a network security breach or compromised personal information, Event Management Insurance to pay for public-relations services to assist in maintaining information privacy after an incident, and CrisisFund Insurance providing money to hire a preapproved public relations firm to preserve the insured’s reputation in case of crisis.
That I was born to be a duck!'
been pretty busy the last couple of days. I had the privilege of working with some local entities in an interdiction operation along a stretch of I-95. if you drove through SC this week, you would not have been able to miss the large police presence out there. it was a sight to see…vehicles being pulled over left and right…blue lights everywhere. I’m still monitoring the radio channel now and there’s a vehicle pulled over every few minutes. I had the pleasure of riding with a pretty dang squared away officer! I had a really good time out there. it’s a lot different from my line of police work. I learned a lot. we spent a lot of time sitting and observing. looking for anything out of the ordinary. which is pretty hard to do when cars are zipping by at 70+ miles per hour. every time we pulled out after somebody, it reminded me of taking off in a plane, or that first drop on a roller coaster. it was freaking awesome. I need a car with power like that! my partner and I only had one arrest…and it was for driving under suspension. we probably could have had a lot more; there were lots of fines and warnings handed out. we searched a good deal of people, along with a good deal of vehicles. we got a little bit of weed and drug paraphernalia off a few people. nothing too significant…all personal use amounts. nothing really what we were looking for. it’s out there. I hope the operation leads to at least one big bust. one team scored 2 oz of heroin, 2 oz of cocaine, and a couple of bottles of methadone off of one stop. clean out your cars people! unless your living out of it. seriously…there are garbage cans at every gas station. at least clean that sh!t out when you stop for gas. I saw a roach crawling around one vehicle. and just all kinds of other sh!t in others. I can’t imagine what these people’s houses look like. well, actually I can. that’s what I’m used to seeing in my line of work.
So with all the festivities of the hop, I have failed to post a couple of my latest creations! Shame on me! Doesn't mean I haven't been scrapping LOL I am going to make my descriptions brief, as I am sooo ready to get off the computer for today! No offense blogger friends, I still love you all!!
As the four of us sat quietly on the darkened porch, we could have been minding our own Ps and Qs by paying our bills online. With the rumbling thunderstorms growing closer, it seemed a bit surreal using our 21st century technology to check in with the world while sitting in the shadow of a bygone era. The town crier was definitely no longer needed to announce the time.
(3)Bring a few extra vessels to your event. No matter how well we pack our items, there is usually one casualty. I always pack a few extra vessels to ensure that we have options in case a vessel breaks. I usually bring extra of the items that can't be easily purchased the day of.
But yesterday I went from university a llittle earlier, popped at Lot333 and took new set of photos of those fabulously decadent bags from MAHIOUT. The rest of the afternoon I spent at secondLove with Lisa chittchating.
to the complicated love of the gods
Years later, I accepted a position as editor-in-chief for an online literary magazine, The Southern Literary Review. While I had served as an editor in various capacities, this job was different. I not only had to check for typos and run a grammatical screener, I also had to schedule content and manage the editorial board. Occasionally, I had to request a full rewrite, or worse, remove a scheduled post because it was not a good fit for our audience.
Excerpt: Benjamin Franklin told us, "Only a virtuous people are capable of freedom. As nations become corrupt and vicious, they have more need of masters." Socialism is a debilitating confidence game dressed up as an ideology used by demagogues and want-to-be dictators to fool its victims into believing it is possible to have your cake and eat it too. Those who fall under the spell of the charlatans singing this siren song actually come to believe it is fair and just to force some people to labor for the good of others.
I really enjoyed this tasting and with a few provisos, mainly that oaky and tannic wines seem to work better with rich, complex lamb curry than the lighter and sweeter chicken ones, I came away thinking that Carmenère and curry go very well together and give a most enjoyable combination.
I'm adding a link here to dVerse ~Poets Pub for their first session of Meeting the Bar: Crit Friday. Looks to be a great place for writer's to get feedback (honest, evaluative feedback) on their poetry.
An ideal Sunday for me would be something that raises the pulse rate a little1 and might involve a little bit of outdoor sport with an element of adrenalin. Climbing is my most favourite pass-time, when I get a chance. Rock climbing in the summer and snow and ice climbing in the winter. Sadly, since leaving regular employment just over 8 years ago, the time consumed in the pursuit of a reasonable level of income from being self employed seems to have rather limited my time available for pure pleasure.
One thing that separates Gualdoni and Shows from Ackermann and Baker, however, is that they play the “ice” card instead of “fire” when it comes to the end, proton decay and carbonic freeze instead of the great contraction or the friction of exploding particles. I tend to favor this sensibility. I like to imagine the end with a certain amount of nuance and quiet instead of drama and spectacle. Ackermann and Baker, in some ways, seem to enact the culture that they critique. They offer spectacles with a footnote of warning, while doing little formally to offer much to the contrary.
I loved the idea that I am part of a tradition of writing that goes back centuries. Like a beacon fire passing information across great distances, our words record what it means to be alive now, our concerns and preoccupations, our joys and fears.
And then.. it started. Lights went out and the black light came on, music starts playing and our yoga instructor turned cycle monster starts yelling. Turn up half a notch, go faster, turn up 2 notches, stand on your bike, turn up another notch, maintain the pace, KEEP GOINGGGGG!!!!!
*As a result of having learned the information above, The Boy and I spent a few extra days at the house. Last night was our first night at the new place. It went really well but we do need to build the bed I bought for him. It's still in a box and I'm dreading the hours it is likely to take to put this thing together. He slept on the mattress on the floor last night but he slept really well, judging by how hard it was to get him up this morning and the fact that he didn't come in the living room where I was.
I still remembered how I felt the first time I read that post--I have never felt more affected and more emotionally engaged by a single post before. Perhaps it was because I, too, am a mother to a daughter only a few years older than Abbey. But I'm quite sure it was Angela's words--every single one of them mirroring my own feelings for my daughter--written so beautifully, that drew me in. Words I've been wishing to tell my daughter but had never been able to (and probably never could) express so eloquently.
Lastly, I subscribe to a theory called Depressive Realism. Basically, it is a theory that while some depressed people have excessivly negative veiws, many moderately depressed people actually have a demonstratively more accurate view of their own powerlessness and futility.
30. Sometimes all you want to do is be clean, warm, dry, and tuning out in front of the internets.
Juice of 1/2 lime
Comments: The hop experiments continue across the board and some are more interesting than others.
8th - banana muffins
Men who only want me for one thing are not likely to suddenly wake up to the rest of me. Ever. They don’t have to. It’s fair. That’s how it goes. And as much as I want it, I’m not wired to want only one thing. No matter what.
With these murders, there is now a toll of 7 dead journalists during the administration of governor Javier Duarte de Ochoa, amongst them reporter Regina Martínez who was a correspondent for Proceso and was murdered last April 28th.
The fact that all this could happen without my consent hangs over me and thousands of others. That is why I am so glad the JCHR report recognises and recommends the need for freestanding legislation to protect the right to independent living in UK law.
By 1988 I had decided to take a break from my traveling life with the road show production I had managed since 1981. My family and I settled back in East Tennessee and I started an entertainment production company. Among the ventures I decided to try was promoting a large scale Christian rock concert in Knoxville. I carefully researched what acts might be the best to put on the show and finally settled upon two giants of Christian rock--Greg X. Volz and Mark Farner. It would be a blockbuster show that would be sure to be a hit.
I had to think of how to make sense of words in a sentence.
It has been reported by the Brooklyn Eagle, the Daily News and other news outlets that the house at 70 Willow St. in Brooklyn Heights has sold for $12 million — the biggest price tag for a single-family home in Brooklyn history.
Individual tickets are $10 and include access to the Children's Festival FUN ZONE.
Today I am wishing it was rainy....so that I could stay home curled up under the covers snoozing and reading a good book. But even if it was rainy that wouldn't do me any good - my crazy busy time at work is still in full swing, so regardless of whether there was a hurrincane raging outside right now or not, I would still be heading to work.
This post, however, isn’t simply a fairy tale lesson about giving people a chance beyond their initial external impressions. As a marketer, a personal brand and a content producer, I often wonder if we should intentionally play to the idea that not only will we be judged by our covers, but some times that creates a wonderful story. In other words, the sweet ain’t as sweet without the sour, right? Nearly all classic epic stories involve characters that eventually achieve glory, but only through harrowing struggles. Without these struggles, without the villains, without the hurdles and roadblocks…would our stories be as compelling or even relatable?
The sign of his growth that I did not miss happened a couple of weeks ago.
I was at Stein’s the other day and saw they had mums and pumpkins for sale and I just couldn’t resist the temptation to buy a few. I wanted to add some festiveness to the front stoop of the house. So, I thought that might be the perfect place to set them.
Anyway, in honor of the holiday I think you’re supposed to make a pie. Having spent thousands of dollars on my baking education I feel I’m somewhat obligated to participate. But then again, it’s already the day of and I don’t have any of the stuff and so on. So instead I’ll show you some pictures of pies that I want to make, have made, or just want to consume whole. If you want recipes for any of the ones that I’ve made (or some that I haven’t, I still may have a recipe) let me know!
So my aim is to make enough to cover a board 60cm x 30cm. Varying the colours of each one but keeping to the same scheme. And of course there will be some sort of polymer clay embellishment added to them as well.
Leaving aside the covers that are just plain wrong, some covers are horrid, ugly, boring, or formulaic (they look like every other paranormal romance/Mr Gum-style silly book/sci-fi fantasy). This is where it gets tricky. The design of a cover is not just an aesthetic matter.The marketing droids have some input, as they know how the cover will resonate with booksellers and purchasers. There is a language of cover art and cover design which you may not speak but you hope the designer and marketing team do speak. The cover is shorthand for 'this book is about XXX; it might appeal to you if you liked YYY.' A lot of the distress authors feel at their book covers is that they feel the cover places their book in the wrong pigeonhole. You might think your novel is a staggering work of original genius that is really a one-off literary novel, but - even if it is - the publisher may think they will sell more if it has a pink glittery cover and picks up on the fluffy romance bits. The publisher is probably right. Cry if you must, but at least you will be able to afford a box of tissues. You don't want your book to look like every other book of that type, but you will sell more if its cover speaks the right dialect. Your paranormal romance won't sell as many copies if the cover is pale blue and yellow rather than black and red.
Staunton
oh god, this is an agent's version of hell: a book about the structure of a book? YIKES!!! You're on the wrong foot here. You're telling us about things we don't have any investment in, and worse, it's about something that's removed from the events themselves: a recounting of the events.
And really, we want him to heal as quickly as possible.
and she's doing quite well
Furthermore, the official name of the debate was “L’extrême droite, est-elle devenue fréquentable?” which translates loosely as “The Extreme Right; has it become touchable?” The debaters were Caroline Fourest and Hervé Hasquin. The moderator was Guy Haarscher. Fourest had taken positions critical of Islam, but she is a feminist, gay, anti-religious and anti-“racist” writer-activist who has criticized Tariq Ramadan, but also Marine Le Pen. Hasquin is a Wallonian politician and ULB historian well known for his liberal-secular views. Haarscher is a professor of law at ULB and to judge by the theme of his books (e.g. Karl Marx, Georg Lukács, Human Rights Law) no raving Rightist.
I would love to tell you that I have some leftover but...umm...they're all in my belly...
Leave it/Not for you/Bad dog
This post follows on from my earlier post "How a Lack of Executive Functioning May Appear in Young Adults" which actually ended up looking at children rather than young adults. (Thanks Sharon for pointing that out.) Hopefully I won't get sidetracked again. If you haven't read that post, you might want to read it before continuing here as it provides a useful introduction to the topic.
In my tale of Mr. Swartz I think I mentioned how all the loony teachers from our school district were put into the basket we called junior high.
Considering the weather and the fact that there were many regional meetings taking place today that simply could not be cancelled at such short notice, it was a superb turnout by people who had to pay to travel in support of their Kinsmen.
*Dave and I are still dating. He's still wonderful. I still hate his schedule--or mine, whichever is the one that keeps us from ever having a day off at the same time. The few we've had, we've had a great time. This last time, he took me target shooting and I did really well. I'd kinda like to go again, now that I know what I'm doing.++
The act of redistricting congressional districts is one of the most partisan, political things that can take place in a state capital. The word “gerrymander” comes from a congressional district, created in Massachusetts by Eldredge Gerry, which resembled a salamander. That was in 1812.
Cut up salted cod in large chunks and add to pot. Add cassava(yucca) and simmer for 35 minutes.
But, you must still see where you are throwing. We use low wattage headlamps. It can be difficult for others in the boat to see the game, but for the person wearing the lamp about to cast a line, the light is just enough to shine those eyes.
That's my story and I'm sticking to it,
To me only some peoples choice Awards reflect at least popularity of a product or effort. But even that is subject to very short term temporary moods. Today we are able to let people follow the process of finding the right person, project, product, service to be awarded. In my mind transparency would help to regain value to any kind of Award.
But enough about me and birthdays. Overrated all around. What I REALLY wanted to tell you about is that-gasp-the last TWO WEEKENDS I've gone out to dinner at the types of swanky places I described in paragraph #1. Last Saturday, it was Starlite with Jaye (for the helluvit). And then tonight it was Imperia with Dah (for her birthday).
I suspect books were written very differently then, but I couldn’t say how, because I’m very reluctant to go back and read them again. I think it might spoil the memories. I did start to read Misty of Chincoteague to my daughter, and it seemed very different to how I remembered. Certainly I didn’t find the Famous Five books half so gripping when my children were into those – but on the other hand, I could see that they were gripped, just as I used to be.
My favorite part so far: Not taking the kids to school, talking to random people while shopping, and eating cereal.
- Jo Jo, Lima, USA, 28/3/2012 04:27
It of course will be purple, orange and gray. My blog is looking too green and blue these days.
Roland Systems Group U.S.
I could "sleep like a log,"
There is such a thin line for me to try to walk here. I have talked to her about how Mark and I are not just casually dating, how I’ve known him for years (which she knows because she’s aware that we go to dinner all the time), that he is going to become a larger part of all of our lives, etc. I try to relate it to how she feels about her boyfriend and how she hangs out with him EVERY SINGLE DAY. But, she just doesn’t understand it. And I’m not sure what to do. If I don’t let him sleepover I feel like I’m letting her dictate how things will go. But, if I continue to let him come over I feel like she will think I don’t value her opinion. I’ve thought of having him just hang out more often, and not spend the night, but she has told me that it’s not him, not that we’re dating, only the sex part.
“I think I’ll join al-Qaeda,” is what he thought of responding, but instead came up with exactly the offer I was hoping for: “Can we zero out your balance?”
1 lb. ground beef
The funny bit of the story is that she could very well have had one of John Dillinger's fingers if the medical examiner had been serious.
Mommy
SB 10.88.29: The Supreme Lord said: My dear son of Sakuni, you appear tired. Why have you come such a great distance? Please rest for a minute. After all, it is one’s body that fulfills all one’s desires.
Greetings Earthlings-
The houses are three hundred metres apart.
Thanks so much Andrea!
She ran at me and my shoulders relaxed waiting for what was going to happen. When at the very last moment, her boyfriend grabbed her from behind and carted her out of the room. As the guy was dragging her out, I let her know that I wished a plague-cocktail of aids/ cancer/ and syphilis to befall upon her car on the way home. The show got back to semi-normal after that. As normal as a show like that can get. I finished my spot and told the black folks that they were going to have to walk me out to my car, in case crazy-shakes was waiting for me in the parking lot. They laughed and said they would.
A:�Keep busy. If you're handy with
Skirt: Boho Hobo; Hummingbird Dress (skirt part)
Here is the double wedding quilt I made for my husband’s sister Cortney. (I blogged about the other sister’s quilt last week). It was a learning curve for me in so many ways. It was the first quilt I sewed using curves! I also learned a ton about machine quilting and marking.
Just about everyone drills a hole at home at least once in their life. Find five drilling tips here.
I've seen my bit of the world, trust me, but here I found, AND find my peace, my inspiration and the stories I want to share with you.
Holy Father, keep Thy people we beseech Thee, for Jesus’ sake: though
Proud.
Suffering, God bless you.
Mountain Sun Pub & Brewery Quinn's Golden Ale
When I got there, my sister was talking to him and there were no horses in the crossties. I was surprised and wondered what was going on. My sister said that they started Cole, and he was so bad that they put him in the stall to wait for me to get there. I was disappointed. I have been working hard the last 2 weeks reviewing his training. She said he was kicking and rearing and biting—now, I started to get skeptical. That didn’t sound like my Cole Train.
Add a few extra steps. Like going online to convert 2.75 cups milk to 650 ml. And soaking the strawberries in a dilute of Betadine disinfectant, rinsing with (yes, overkill) bottled water we then filter and boil. I hope this works; the embassy doc recommends bleach solution instead.
For example, how can one claim to show the history behind the Hajj when there is no historical evidence of Islam on the Arabian peninsula? And so there was very little to show about the Hajj except copies of the Koran, hajjis’ reports about the Hajj, intricately stitched prayer carpets, and movies about the experiences of those who completed the Hajj. As expected, it wasn’t much, because there isn’t much.
Luigi had nothing to say about the elephant and whale machines. It was well known that the tiger machine was the most difficult to operate in the entire factory. Why, the elephant and whale machines almost operated themselves. It took no skill whatsoever to keep them popping out respectable elephants and whales.
'As you can see, Sofia (and her older brother!) are already enjoying their new iPad2! Although we have been actively watching the previous blogs about the other very fortunate children who have received their iPad2 and cheering them on, it was incredibly surreal when the postman delivered Sofia's to us on Saturday. After waiting for so long, and being so disappointed, we couldn't believe that the day had actually come when we would see her open up her very own iPad! Sofia absolutely loves it. She is especially enjoying playing music and listening to animal sounds, so far, but we know that the possibilities will be endless and we cannot wait to see her thrive with this wonderful therapeutic tool!
Lawless (Film Trailer)
Takes 40 minutes to make
‘Of those who brought such sorrow to our times
-He is 22 lbs
12.) “Here’s to the crazy ones. The misfits. The rebels. The troublemakers. The round pegs in the square holes. The ones who see things differently. They’re not fond of rules. And they have no respect for the status quo. You can quote them, disagree with them, glorify or vilify them. About the only thing you can’t do is ignore them. Because they change things. They push the human race forward. While some may see them as the crazy ones, we see genius. Because the people who are crazy enough to think they can change the world, are the ones who do.”–Apple Inc.
Dash of cayenne pepper
This sounds pretty dismal, doesn’t it? But it is true, and as I think back on the way I was, it makes me sick. I was heading toward disaster. I had my spot marked in hell. I had prime real estate in the hottest place there is.
beer manager
2 All About Henry
Martin is also the film's production designer. A two time Academy Award winner (Moulin Rouge) and Tony Award winner for the set design of Broadway's La Boehme, "CM" has her own line of rugs, paints and wallpapers. Many of the sparrow and vine designs are inspired by her native Australia as well as Asian designs and traditional lace. I interviewed CM on the set of the film Australia several years ago and she is a dynamo -- it's no easy feat doing double duty with costume and production design. The mother of two was also getting ready to launch the Catherine Martin line as a natural extension of her film work. The line is distributed in Australia with Designer Rugs and Porter's Paints. (You can read more of the article on my website under Articles/Four Seasons magazine).
Nicholas Royle – Moving Out
DOI ARRESTS FOUR INDIVIDUALS ON BRIBERY CHARGES BASED ON TIPS FROM CITY BUILDINGS INSPECTORS
Yep, go ahead & try it. You have one minute, GO.
Asian Bridal Hair and Bridal Makeup
i mixed them all together
There are questions that fill in the gaps
So my headache isn't gone. In fact, it's still pretty bad from yesterday's incident. But I think we FINALLY have an answer. I just need to get more diligent in my label-reading and while eating or drinking out. I now have a cheat sheet in my phone of 21 different artificial sweeteners since I'm trying to avoid them all....even "natural" things like Stevia. It's not easy though. They seem to be hidden just about everywhere. But, with luck, this is it.
This is also where Vi met William 'Bill' Saroyan. "Not long ago, a group of men from Company 'C,' Wright Field, wrote and produced a 'Gay 90's Review.' This began as an amateur production but with such men as Lynn Riggs and William Saroyan planning it, it turned out to be a real production and art creation."
Dear Anna Rose—
As I am fully aware of my verbomania, I have to be extra careful to maintain validity. I love nothing more than writing a lyrical and sweeping paragraph, preferably one that has me blowing into a Kleenex, and then reading it aloud to myself. But far too often I use deep poetic license and end up scrapping the tear jerking prose. Why? Because it’s verbose and since I don’t write literary fiction, I write YA, and one sentence usually cuts to the chase.
Lisa looked at the watch and smiled.
They offer such brands as Coach, Dooney & Bourke, Gucci, Cole Haan, Furla and Mark Jacobs just to name a few. Along with those great labels they also carry hard to find vintage items by these same designers and more.
I'm guessing that, by the time he was done, I had about half a gallon mixture of apple juice, water, milk, raisins, crackers, chips, turkey, bread and chocolate all down the front of me.
“I’m sorry I’m putting you through all this. And you’re sick, too…”
I'm fighting the biggest wrinkle between my brow. I realized most of it is due to stress at work. I refuse to let my clients leave a stamp on my face! So, I have to remind myself to not frown so much.
Our dog was a collie. She loved to chase cars. She thought she was herding sheep instead of cars. Part collie, mostly mutt her features were more of a collie than any other breed. She exhibited next her speed. She’d follow me around all over town and chased cats and rabbits whenever she saw them. What name do you think we gave her? Bear! Bear! Come here, Bear! She had become unhappy and wouldn’t mind us. And loved the funeral blues. Mercy! We all loved the blues. And the most beautiful girls I knew got the blues sometimes. That didn’t mean they was unhappy. Bear! Come here! Bear! Fetch!
Red Bull surprised everyone with their revised car that appeared on the last day of testing. As the car sported revised exhaust systems with a low exit that aims the exhausts over the diffuser. While exhaust driven diffusers were popular in the nineties before periscope exhausts became the norm, to have the exhaust play over the top of the diffuser is a relative novelty. However the Newey designed solution on the RB6 is a little more complicated than it first appeared. In one shot we can see the upper deck of the diffuser features a window (Arrowed) to allow the exhaust gas to pass inside the diffuser, rather than solely over it. With the aim that the high speed exhaust gas will drive more flow through the diffuser to increase downforce.
Sure enough, two of the best cheap eats in NYC are even better when they are together. This Falafel wrapped Andouille (was going to use a hot dog but I found these amazing sausages) worked way better than I ever thought it would. With the corn dog as inspiration, wrapping the sausage with my homemade falafel mix and frying in safflower oil proved to be a fantastic idea. I made a quick sauce of greek yogurt, roasted red pepper, and cucumber that gave just enough freshness to pair with the hearty Falafel Dog. I’m excited to give this one a go in the “mini” form for catering hors devours and even go back and see what else I can add.
Yes and no. In an interview Matadin explains that when they first arrived on the scene, their early work was often taken as a send-up of fashion photography, and their work frequently takes on a subversive element. A series of photos of young children glammed up and giggling through the makeup puts the spotlight on child pageantry years before Toddlers and Tiaras. What makes Pretty Much Everything work as a photography book is that photos from the couple’s many diverse projects are mixed and juxtaposed for maximum resonance. This is not a chronology of their growth as artists but a summation of themes. Thus improbable celebrity juxtapositions are offered – who would have
Domino Quick Fixes will be full of Domino’s best home decorating stories, focusing on easy,
And why be fearful?
That's it for today Sweethearts. Please remember to rock our link badge on your blogs with a working link leading back to us. The Lollipop Girls LOVE to see that when they view your creations for our challenges.
Calico Cat Holmes… It’s cute, but I feel that I maybe put my expectations a little bit too high. It would be lifeless without Fujiki and Okura.
Queen Latifah ... ELLIE
“Every record on the album is about the struggles and challenges we face in life and what we can do to overcome them. While some songs are still pop, it’s not really about partying in the club, love, or loss in a typical sense. It’s much deeper,” they explain. Sonically, the group is tinkering with faster bpms, challenging themselves with their sound and instrumentation, moving through multiple genres seamlessly.
If CISPA enters into US law, alongside the recently enacted National Defense Authorization Act – which gives the government the power to detain any American for anything forever – fundamental civil liberties will be threatened in a way that no democracy can tolerate. And because so much of the freedom of the Internet around the world derives from the freedom of expression that until recently characterized the US, enactment of CISPA poses a similar threat around the world.
The share then dropped back, and found an upward support line, which fell on 31.00p. A bounce was to be expected, and a bounce is what happened. It could either have hit the uptrending resistance, or gone on to reach a Fibonacci figure. I guessed it would stop on the 38.2% Fib earlier in the week, so i sold out at 32.40p, which also happened to be exactly the upward trend resistance, to make 8%. £40 profit.
Tutti frutti: 3 tbsp
"Aw nooooo! The bank isn't even open! Is there anyone at home?" (he explained that I didn't need to hand out all my bank details, that World Vision was trusted by the direct debit people and that I could cancel it at any time.)
2-4 tbsp light soya sauce
But sanity does.
for stars stolen from the night
8:00am: Awake and completely fucked pain-wise. I spent about 10 minutes perched on the edge of my bed trying to figure out how hoist my leg up and over. Sorrow.
I have always been a pretty “scheduled” person, but since meeting S almost ten years ago (wow…), his spontaneity has mixed with my planning for what I think is a nice little balanced life. When A was born (after he got home from the hospital), we let him feed and sleep on demand, and continued letting him set the pace until it naturally developed into a rough schedule around 8 or 9 months. My challenge now is to maintain that schedule without locking us up in the house or making all of our friends and family work around us. I’m still figuring out exactly how to do that and how much I can push him without jeopardizing his overall sleep (and mood!), but I’m working on it!
A universal telephoto lens with outstanding performance. The longer focal length is excellent for tightly framed shots, enabling a shallow depth-of-field to be used to make the main subject stand out noticeably.
Over and out,
The last few mornings I’ve been at the gym there’s been a gal working out- she obviously does Crossfit. She has AMAZING arms. Shoulders specifically! It’s nice to see a gal lift as heavy as me… Though she uses lifting hooks whereas I use no grips or straps! Lol… But impressive non the less!
The Ultimate Christmas Present ... Disney (east) ... 2:30 AM
- 2 tsp ground cinnamon
I'm happy that you stopped by to visit. I love hearing what you think and paying you a visit too.
I have a nice big desk and double monitors - love! I'm a visual organizer, so I need everything laid out where I can see it. I'm the sticky note queen! As receptionist, I greet everyone who comes off the elevator - if it's someone I like, they get a cheer! Yay!
But I'll love ya' longer, stronger
Devin made a large batch of blueberry biscuits for breakfast this morning. We ate half and I will freeze the rest for next week. She regularly mixes up large batches of our favorite chocolate chip cookie dough. She uses a cookie dough scoop to make small scoops, places them on a cookie sheet, flash freezes them and then bags them up for later use. Cooking in bulk is a time and money saver!
Oops, back up here: when the onions and celery are limp, that’s the time to put in the okra. You can leave them whole or slice them, but if whole, leave the cap on so the okra will stay intact. Cook and stir until the okra, onions and green pepper are a bit brown.
How about you? Tried any new recipes lately?
It seems most national brand dry Cat Foods are almost like chicken feed. Ingredient like corn, wheat, bone product and barley are not good for cats. I know money is tight now days but choosing a quality Cat Food can save money in the long run. Our cat is like family to us. We always try to do what is best for our kitty. Also, look for Cat Food that is designed for the age of your cat. If your cat is strictly indoors providing some eatable plants is a good idea. Choosing Healthy Cat Food- See Main Article
It was something that happened a long time ago, something that I fought so hard to prevent and something that in the end, proved to be so much stronger than me.
THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE & HER LOVER (Jean-Paul Gaultier)
These images are photolithographs, which are made from adding color to black-and-white photographic negatives.
To learn more about the benefits of implementing SafetyFirst, contact Jeff Cruey, CPCU, Divisional Senior Vice President.
He is an architect. His a very, very, very, very, good one.
Saturday, July 29, 7:30PM at Corbett vs. Dempsey
serve with the cucumber sauce and any fresh onions or tomatoes you may have
Added to that is the struggle of De Waal as he looks to unlock his family history – although fortunately for him his ancestors were not only wealthy but also well documented as figures in the social scenes of the time.
Wishing you all the best,
Like everything else you write, it has to have function, reveal character, move plot.
Backwards mask, get your autograph and your suicide pact
Job Code:
Virna Lindt – The Dossier on Virna Lindt
My Mind's Eye LUSH Paper Collection!!
Perhaps one of the things I love best, are these picture portholes. They're old family pictures, and I've said it before and I'll say it again: I'm quite taken with them.
My always over-excited and enthusiastic dog. (She is truly my twin).
Continuing to do what I’m not supposed to
Narrator No Bill, I can’t see the gardener anywhere. It’s safe to come out.
Government machinery was intact.Police evacuated people from beaches.Tsunami alert was issues and finally withdrawn after 6 PM.
50. Reproducing, eh? Mind if I help? (ya kinda need to be at a copy maching for this one)
East of England. 24.
Rue Sainte-Sulpice
Would I recommend this show extravaganza? Hell, yes, highly.
34. Wally Gator
The third issue discussed by Robert was that of "communication to the public", as reflected in Case C-162/10 I v Ireland (on which see earlier post here). PPI objected that Irish law exempted hotels etc from paying for music piped into guests' bedrooms under the Rental Directive. The Advocate General, following the Court's ruling in Case C-306/05 SGAE, considered that there is communication to the public by making music available to guests and that hotels, by supplying the equipment by which guests received the music, were the users who were liable to make the payment. The Irish government's argument that, since one payment had already been received for broadcasting a work, no further payment was necessary, was rejected. On the same issue, Case C-135/10 SCF Consorzio Fonografici v Marco Del Corso, a reference from Italy regarding the playing of music in dentists' surgeries, was also discussed. Do the facts that the music is ancillary to dental work, and are not chosen by the patient, lead to a different conclusion? No, it appears: the patient in the dental chair and the guest in his hotel room are essentially the same.
Here’s a little selection.
More than 7,000 workers from US company Freeport McMoRan’s massive gold and copper mine in Indonesia’s western Papua region started a week-long strike on Monday (4/7) to demand better wages.
Pistachios
Personally, I much prefer this medium because you are also able to gauge the veracity of what’s presented with your own sense of sight and hearing. Apart from reading the body language, of course.
Check out the full gallery here at Yahoo! News http://movies.yahoo.com/photos/best-dressed-at-the-2012-indie-spirit-awards-slideshow/2012-film-independent-spirit-awards-purple-carpet-photo-1330206049.html
. . . Primary examiners are “quicker” — i.e., that patents examined by a primary examiner issue more quickly and with fewer amendments than those examined by assistant examiners. . . . As may be guessed, issued patents associated with an “assistant examiner” are much more likely to have an extension. (78% of patents with assistant examiner have extension compared with 69% of patents examined only by a primary examiner). It appears that at least some of the quickness is due to the examiner actually acting more quickly (rather than merely compromising more easily).
And then, sheepishly, I asked our waiter about dessert. I wanted Gulab Jamun, badly. If you've not had Gulab Jamun and you like syrupy sweet desserts, get your ass to an Indian restaurant, immediately. I don't care if it is not open right now, go wait. These things are little dense balls, not unlike cake donuts with the texture of a hushpuppy, soaked in a sugar syrup that is heavily laced with cardamom and rosewater, until they cannot hold another drop of syrup, and dear people, they are so very good.
The biggest influence in my life was my grandmother, Nana Mickey, a creative person who was not aware of her own giftedness. She used to babysit for us every Saturday night and thrill us with her made-up stories of smugglers and kidnappers at the South Street Seaport. Each week she'd leave off at a cliffhanger to be continued the following week. When I was a bit older, I would raid her bookshelves for romance novels. I think that's why I've always been drawn to write stories that were suspenseful and romantic.
This post was written about two years ago, when I was still a columnist for our local paper, the Linn County Leader. There was a LOT of fallout over plans that were in progress to hold a town hall meeting to discuss a local business in town that was selling bath salts, BoCoMo Dew (a marijuana-like substance that kids were smoking in town and other items right on the main street of our town.) It was disturbing, to say the least.
In Anchorage, Alaska, we have pristine water from wells and a beautiful mountain lake, Eklutna Lake, and then we let the government destroy it, putting a known poison into our public drinking water — a substance that Stalin used to dumb down and pacify the prisoners in the Gulag.
"WHAT DID I DO THIS TIME?"
If only all things in life were that simple!
2) Empty Friend by Failure - from "Magnified"
He told the Daily Telegraph: ‘It makes people so incredibly angry when you are getting up early in the morning, working really hard to try and do the right thing for your family and for your community, you are paying your taxes and then you see people literally in a different galaxy who are paying extraordinarily low rates of tax.’
If your soul needs love you can get consoled by pity
Before I get any more cynical, I will say that my heart hurts for friends who are in despair. Either on the one end of the spectrum, having found who they think is their true love but is unrequited- or the other end feeling out at sea with no land in sight and wondering which direction to paddle. I wish I had more to say. I wish I had exactly what you need to hear to stop the hurt and the frustration and loneliness. I wish I could wave a magic wand and click my ruby shoes and do the hand jive and make it all perfect for you. But I’m all out of pumpkins and helpful mice and magic is so 1980s. We’ll always need love, sweet love, but we have learned that it’s hard work and eventually, you have to pay down that loan. Love is a loan, in many ways. And the greater the investment, the higher the payout and the risk. We need more risk takers. With good financial advisors.
You can also follow me on twitter http://twitter.com/emilypage31 - no, I don’t let you know when I’m eating ice cream or walking the dog, but I will let you know about the monthly specials and any incentives I may be offering.
We drive for four miles before turning left onto a gravel road, then pass open cut fields that are probably full of corn in the summer, then through a dense forest for about a mile. And then we fi nd it, tucked away in overgrown vegetation, a rusted silver mailbox with black lettering painted on the side of it that reads 17 OLD MILL RD.
Judy snorted a laugh but I could tell she was rattled. She might mock my youthful energy and zest for free living but she also knew I couldn’t help it. The moment we’d arrived in Sardinia, naturism had become my new thing. Now that we’re back, I’m finding it hard to adjust. Frankly, a man spends so much time under that hot sun that his body learns to hate the restrictions of jollies and vest. And when a man has a body such a mine, one has an obligation to treat it well, polish it daily, and to show it off whenever possible. It’s a bit like owning an Audi.
"N30 and the campaign to date was reviewed by UNISON's Head of Local Government for Wales, Dominic MacAskill. He stressed the historic nature of the action; 30+ unions working together, the numbers on demonstrations, support from the public and the 126% increase in recruitment from the announcement of the ballot to the day of strike action itself. The lesson he drew from this however was that 'we need to be realistic' and that 'we need a negotiated settlement'. We were told that we should therefore welcome the 'Heads of Agreement' as a 'significant advance'.
Authorial Asides: This novel has a star from Publishers' Weekly, a star from Booklist, and a star from Kirkus... which must have felt extremely good to this author. Congratulations, Robin, you have so earned this. ☺
She listened and consoled me. Then she said, “You’ve got to talk to him. He’s your husband. You both need to fix this.”
There is absolutely no doubt that the second person of the Trinity chose to be born to a family and setting of great poverty.
Soon Savannah is in over her head. She's run off the road and nearly killed, haunted by a mystery stalker and freaked out when the brother of one of the dead women is murdered when he tries to investigate the crime. To complicate things, something weird is happening to her powers. Pitted against shamans, demons, a voodoo-inflected cult and garden-variety goons, Savannah has to fight to ensure her first case isn't her last. And she also has to ask for help, perhaps the hardest lesson she's ever had to learn.
I confided in two friends that, perhaps, I should experiment with my sexuality…I wanted to know what it was like to be with a girl…how it would make me feel. After all, based on my logical take on the world, there were more than a few occasions when I was told that I would “make a GREAT lesbian”…whatever THAT means…
Nick shrugged and Lindsay looked optimistic.
These photography tips are designed to help you make your photographs looks bright, eye catching and professional and you don't need to have an expensive camera to do this!
6. Preheat oven to 160 degrees centigrade (fan assisted oven). Everyone’s oven is different, so bear in mind that temperature and cooking time may vary greatly.
Streusel Topping:
"Stay away from us, Lynne." I warn her, "I'm not that weak Betazoid you used as a doormat when we were teenagers."
Now the economic outlook is shifting, despite modest gains over the years Lesotho remains one of the world’s poorest countries. The 2011/12 budget was “the most difficult the government had to put together,” reckons Finance Minister Timothy Thahane. His worries include a slowdown in economic growth, rising unemployment and diminishing revenues from migrant workers who are losing jobs in South Africa. Lesotho also faces declining agricultural production, falling life expectancy and high HIV infection rates.
Yet, what these countries have piously demanded at a global level – heterogeneity, diversity and tolerance of other – they are increasingly moving away from, and in fact are actively clamping down on, at a national level.
Chris Petrella (REP) 1.19% 44
Coni was buried with dignity and care next to her friend Promise. I never, ever expected to have to say goodbye to 2 horses this soon, and most especially not my Coni, my sweet girl...
Additionally, legitimate capitalism, which is the financial backbone of America and has been responsible for the success of our great nation - not its downfall, has been purposely demonized by its merger with crony capitalism. Crony capitalism is the incestuous bonding between business and government, the use of influence, inside information, and other illegal and immoral activity that enriches those in government and private individuals. It is this intentional merging of legitimate and crony capitalism that obfuscates the problem and provides a layer for protection for the crony capitalists themselves.
Maybe listening to braggers made me see what I was missing in life. These kids' parents bought them "things", gave them "things" that I might not have had.
Anyway, they both realize something went wrong so he leaves, but not before he puts his foot in some dog poop. Basically, Park Ha’s landlady’s grandson took an immediate disliking to Yi Gak so he put some dog poop in his shoe. Why? Because he didn’t like how Yi Gak was yelling at her. And? And since he likes Park Ha, it’s his duty to protect her. Ding ding ding! Yi Gak just got schooled by a third-grader.
So make sure you check back throughout the day!
Whether working in a mine all day is hard work or not isn’t subjective, it’s just hard work. But the results of an artist’s labor is much more subjective – if someone doesn’t find a piece of art appealing, they don’t care how much time the artist put into creating it, or what it means. The only thing that’s important is how much it cost. Why can’t we look beyond that?
The first thing that I look at is the size and I am sure most of you do at least this one. When I look at sizes, I evaluate my everyday life and what size do i need. So I need a bag that is big enough that I can fit everything that I need for a work/school day … more times than not, I would chose a big hand bag or even a tote bag.
Malaysians are intelligent and when will our leaders realize this?
This is a picture of the first thing I use in the morning.
You may think the stories on crime shows are “ripped from the headlines,” but Lineberry found that the shows usually forget to rip the ones involving minorities, for starters. (For that matter, so does TV news. But if the victim is young and white, you will soon see more of her family than your own.)
(But it's a damn lie.)
Art. 26 (Notification of the parties) When the copyright administrative management entity has drafted an administrative punishment decision, the person in charge of that entity should sign an issue an administrative punishment advance notice, informing the parties on the facts, grounds and basis of the drafted administrative punishment decision, as well as informing the parties on their rights of declaration, right of defence and other rights.
Now, with de Sales fresh in my mind, here was my theology professor “wielding the knife,” gently but with piercing precision. He had seen my abundant anxiety and stress over this test and over the struggles of college life in general, and so he was offering some simple and honest fraternal correction. I worried too much, and he knew it, and so he suggested that I try to give it up.
i'm still working on this camera situation, but in the meantime, here's a nice update of our weekends so far.
That is one reason I am grateful for my lack of medical access. It is possible that if I were on the right insurance, I'd be encouraged, or even required, to get any number of tests.
Refractive error correction
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to perceive myself being stuck in my mind where I am unable to see clearly what I am doing and where I am going with each word that I write
I’m a man in my 30′s, born in Thailand, grew up in America, not close to my family, deeply in love with my soul mate, and creative. But something tells me I’m more than that.
To enter the competition, all you have to do is write something about beer and time, up to a maximum of 500 words. It can be about the oldest beer you've drunk, or the freshest. It can be a technical essay on the ravages of oxygen on cask beer, a treatise on the historical evolution of the term IPA, or it could be about a long-held yearning and search for a perticular beer. Anything, basically, as long as there is some relation to time in it. Although if you decide to write anything that uses the phrase "time at the bar, please" as the link to time, you won't win. Look, it's my competition, and those are my rules.
A big ending for my weekend was necessary, and so I finished things off with Drunk In Hell in The Old Library. Noise-rock, but times a million billion. They just sort of go “BRRROOOOOAAARGGGGHHHH” with massive riffs and menacing intent, and it’s ace. It’s as though the movement of continents started accelerating. I’ve often thought (by which I mean I’ve just thought for the first time) that there’s only one band at a time in a country who can harness such a degree of raw elemental oomph – Mistress used to be the British representatives, but now it’s Drunk In Hell.
Unsoulclogged – Not weighed down in spirit.
we simply love our little squish!
Mrs. Thwett comes over to chat with her nephew, William Popper. They have some conversations about how she disapproves of the girl he's seeing, Jane Kauffmann, who is a Faulkner fan but, much to the aunt's disapproval, doesn't ever bother to clean up the place. The aunt claims Jane is unattractive, which is untrue; in fact, for the longest time, William didn't even notice her beauty until others began checking her out. They have some conversations about how William's father ought to divorce his mother, but that he shouldn't move into his own housing developments because it would be an insult to his wealth. Williams says of his father, "We have a fine relationship."
Which is my only Freedom from you
CDs
- Fresh ground pork $2.89/lb ($6.37/kg)
Press lists are VERY important. There are two kinds I’ve encountered so far. One is the press list you build personally, for your own use when sending press releases (and you may want to have a few that vary depending on
“There’s everything of interest here, and I want off.” I leaned forward. “You’ve said it before; I’m free to do whatever I want right? I want to get off right here.”
I have two questions for people that actually pay attention to the show. (1) Isn’t this something we should have seen in season one( a few of us mentioned this earlier) and (2) when she first used her microwave fingers of fail for the first time on MaryAnn, why did she look like she had never seen it before in her life? The spoiler said she would use her ‘POWERS’ plural, not ‘POWER’ singular, so this implies that ‘magical light saber shooting out of her hands’, not just her telepathy. That is how I see it anyway.
Before tackling the planting, we'd already made one change from last year. We went from two motion armchairs (which I sold on Craigslist) to one bench that doesn't move at all. And not moving at all is the whole point, after fighting those chairs for two years now. They really like to tip over in the strong wind that tends to hit our top floor balcony. I'd set pavers on the base of each to keep them upright, and that had worked. But it turns out that pavers attract toddler feet like nothing else, and James was tripping on them every day.
The majority of my day is now spent negotiating interviews, cold calling and e-mailing producers and “meeting” reporters on a call or via BlackBerry.
Although U.S. Fish and Wildlife (USFWS)had previously criticized Wyoming's wolf plan on the grounds that unregulated shooting in most of the state would reduce the state’s wolf population below federally required levels, this plan that scientists concerned is now back on the table.Furthermore, next week the House of Representatives will work on the 2013 Budget Bill and many fear that Wyoming's Congressional delegation will seek to get another "no judicial review" budget rider passed to protect the extremely controversial wolf plan from being challenged in court. If your hackles are up, the National WolfWatcher Coalition offers a quick and easy way you can be a voice for Wyoming’s wolves. http://wolfwatcher.org/news/all-news/urgent-action-needed-for-wyoming-wolves-now/
55. Sound of Thunder
This card is entered at the challenge at:
Doth steal my things- a daybreak tainting.
And YOU are the one that is fucked up in the head. I made my choice given the cards I was dealt with. YOU are the one that put me in that situation. That is on YOU. Not me but you.
If you are reading this, Please leave a comment so I will know you were there. Last year the tally was over 1400 hits, and about 12 comments from family and one friend. Yet people have told me they read them all. We get credit for those who make comments. Thanks.
a long segment. I saw a little of each on the trail, and got my hopes up.
Sent to: letters@the-sun.co.uk
A favorite song of mine on Undead is Delayed Combustion Device. The Scar and Formaldehyde are unreal killer songs as well. Undead flows together so fine, no song is out-of-place. A Death Metal must it is. I will admit, It’s a grand year when both Six Feet Under and Cannibal Corpse release new studio albums. Death Metal fans of all generations have a lot to celebrate about in 2012 and Six Feet Under is one substantial reason why. Metal be thy name.
Value to Senators Memorabilia Collector born that year = Priceless
I cant do this
Eyes: Kawaii Floral Eyes -Splash-(Kawaii Fair)
Chris from Stale Gum keeps a running total of his expenditures right on the face of his blog. That is ballsy. I am sub-consciously keeping myself in the dark about how much I spend on cards, because I like collecting (spending), and if I really take an honest personal inventory of my spending, I may not like what I see.
Same old rats as blooming tame,
Men should drive the tanks, fly the jets and fight the wars.
It's Ros here with you this week ... Back from my travels
Figure 4: A comparison between average weekly YoY wage growth, RPI and household consumption expenditure in the UK. Source: ONS, Eurostat.
For those of you who do not have a clothesline, just get creative! I used to clip my diapers onto hangers and hang them from my banister. I have also placed a drying rack on the patio and placed my diapers “face” up in the sun.
Coming in from the West was relatively easy with no winter conditions and excellent driving conditions. But, this is all about to change. from what I hear a huge winter storm was racing across the Midwest.
I did learn that 2-ply is wonderful for it's regular use, but a good single ply would work better in your card making....
What are psychedelic drugs?
While I did not get run off, there was that hilariousness when a delivery truck parked at the loading dock did a big circle around the building and parked itself where I was standing at the front about to shoot some re-takes. Not as close as that truck in Brooklyn, but nevertheless intruding on personal space.
What is it about exposure that can push sane, compassionate, smart, and fair minded people – right off the deep end? Not that she’s compassionate nor smart, but it reminds me of the movie Game Changer – the story of the McCain political campaign that introduced Sara Palin to the world. Sara Palin THOUGHT she knew what being part of a national presidential campaign would entail. In reality, she had no idea. She was wholly unprepared, woefully under-qualified, and exposed, as such, nationally. Thank god we were spared her running down the street naked and pounding the pavement with a McCain/ Palin poster.
Reason 4: My favorite quality about AdWords is that it rewards good ad performance – that is, for an ad that converts (clicks/impressions percentage) exceptionally well (high click-through-rate (CTR)), your ad will get better ad placement as well as better pricing.
I have lived in Cleveland for 28 years and last Saturday was the first time I have been in Tremont – I think. Lincoln Park looked familiar, so I might have driven by there once a long time ago, lost and looking for something else with no clue that I was in Tremont.
It was with this common philosophy of the Light that eased the fears of the people of Azeroth. Who could have blamed the Night Elves, seeing them crash onto a nearby isle, appearing like those demon Eredar that had haunted their planet in the past, for attacking them at first? But the Light ended up easing the tensions between them all. Brulee would not be surprised if the Naaru had it’s hand in that too.
“Dawson,” he said, “a Mr. Evan Evans will be calling here at half-past three on Thursday afternoon to see the pictures. If I’m out, ask him to call later. I don’t know anything about him. And see that the frames are dusted. Do it yourself, and get no help from Mrs. Dawson or Mary; they’d want to dust too much.”
This is a project I did last year but, I have had a few people ask how I did it. So... here it is:
Note : Have you ever been confronted by a road bully when you try to caution them?
(404): I mean, he was my book buddy in 1st grade. The kid taught me how to read, the least I could do was give him head.
For about 5 minutes until it cut out again. For a LONG time.
We will also be doing a little beadboard/paint project for those cabinets, but alas, that shall wait until baby is here, settled, and I am over the shock of now being a mother of 3.
As a result of all this some might now be watching Guido instead of Hague and if so I'd say that that's Guido's only real fuck up. There's a good reason the teller shouldn't become bigger than story, but did the teller intend that? Only Guido can answer that honestly but if each blogger is responsible for nothing beyond what they themselves write then it's hard to credit Guido with becoming bigger than the story when it's actually the rest of us writing about Guido who've achieved that. And here I am writing half a dozen paragraphs about Guido bloody Fawkes instead of William Hague's decision to pour taxpayer's money into the pockets of someone whose main qualification to be a SpAd seems to be that he has a driving licence.
In the book of Acts chapter 19, Paul was accused of provoking the Ephesians . He did not do that. He debated with the locals and was able to convince people. Because the Holy Spirit was with him.
your voice for screams
pushed, piled and massed
We were a little hesitant to review Fairway Market after our first visit, simply for that fact that it was such a massive sensory overload, there was absolutely no way we absorbed everything in that first trip. Well, that, and it was so freakin’ busy I’m pretty sure I now know what cattle feel like when being herded through a gate.
After 46 years as the Head Coach of Penn State University football team, Joe Paterno knew when it was time to take a loss on the football field. But unfortunately he couldn’t transfer that know-how into real life situations, and ultimately it cost him everything: His job, his dignity, and most likely, his life. Because it’s obvious now that his job was his life. He just couldn’t live without being the coach.
Family stability will suffer a further blow if the Government presses ahead with its plans, the Centre for Social Justice (CSJ) warned in a report.
It's about this point we are starting to feel our bellies distend and yet still the onslaught of incredible dishes continues. The Pig's trotters Pierre Koffman is a signature dish by Pierre Koffman that was adapted and made famous by Marco Pierre White at Harvey's in 1980s. This dish is a test of patience and endurance, involving braised trotters that are deboned and then stuffed with sweetbreads, morels and chicken mousse.
Am I just a ticking time bomb
So we went to a beach called St Pol near Sant Feliu de Guixols, had a slow walk around the coast path and then a long and even slower lunch in El Racó de St Pol.
Now I’ll try and get some sleep before I get to Killarney and take the Disco for a spin.
As usual, Mr Young gets on extremely well with Mrs Jones and, as usual, I can hear them making plans for a French trip. This happens every time the two of them get together.
Thank you for visiting today, and I hope to see your designs for kids with buttons, ribbons and/or bows at Send a Smile 4 Kids.
Kept the laundry done.
The part about Wall Street being a very cold place full of personally unsatisfied people is almost never discussed publicly. It’s just the money that gets discussed.
ULTRAMAN: TOWARDS THE FUTURE debuts in America. This 13 episode mini-series was filmed entirely on location in Australia with an international cast.
Genre: Nonfiction/Humor
I totally forgot to blog about this super nerdy thing I've done!
“Do you want to try something?” I asked.
SPEAKING of monsters chewing on things:
Mustard seeds - 1 pinch
Like my crush on Christopher, my method of seduction (or lack thereof), was basically staring at the guy all the time, memorizing his class schedule, looking him up in old yearbooks, and making my poor friends listen to me obsess about him.
"It pays, literally, to stay on top of fashion," writes my friend, whose blog is a treasure trove of thoughts and advice for the nouveau pauvre of the Great Recession.
1) Fayes labour was a lot shorter.
Claire Estates A Senior's Residence.
Ramo de flores: Peeled Paint, Spun Sugar, Mustard Seed y Worn Lipstick
This was my job today to plant these garden urns...the view doesn't get better than this! Barefoot, and soil covered hands, love it.
Power: 95/100
After the panel, I got to hang out with some of the Marauders, , my online friends who are funny, sharp, heartfelt, and great at words. They're quite ethical, too. Meg, Sandi, and Sue came to the panel discussion with a couple of friends and Sandi's daughter, Kathryn. Sandy and Kathryn had flown in from Nashville to spend the weekend with Meg, who lives in Wisconsin, and Sue took the train from Detroit. After the panel we wandered down to the waterfront then over to Millennium Park, ducking into the art museum and a coffee shop when the clouds opened. I'd only met Meg online, and as usual it seemed as if we'd known each other for years. Which we have. It's just that we'd never met in person.
Well, at least he knows my name, which is more than I thought he did. I wonder if he knows just how irritating he was being? Who knows. But I didn’t go inside. He’s not the boss of me, and besides, I was enjoying the show. He scowled at me the whole day, but I don’t care. The first three words he’s said to me was to act like my boss? I don’t think so.
And if I tell you the highway turning to take
It’s true…and proven time and again – men opt for a “crime-thriller-suspense” novel when it comes to writing. And rightly so. They have a knack to capture and portray the precise feelings associated with the genre. And Oswald Periera does complete justice to his debut novel- The Newsroom Mafia that offers more than just the thrill of being a media-related-crime story.
Tx #1
1) A dairy cow drinks 20-50 gallons of water...almost a bathtub full each day...while I drink about 40 Nalgene bottles of water a day plus 1-2 mugs of coffee plus 1-2 glasses of milk.
Repeat step one.
3. Beat together the cream cheese, icing sugar, vanilla extract and lemon juice in a bowl until smooth.
I invite you to take a look at the new site. If you have tried PE before when it was a Yahoo group, then do yourself a favor and try out the new site - I think you will be surprised!
Axelrod: he would have stood by and let
and as you might expect, we just want to see anything with wings, so you could use angels, fairies, planes, dragonflies, anything you want :)
Takers came from 195 countries. One was Michael Bewley, 27, a Sydney electrical engineer. He was preparing to start a PhD in robotics and machine learning at Sydney University.
John Bremond, Sr. opened a dry goods store in Austin in 1846, eventually settling on what is now the southwest corner of Sixth and Brazos. He later added groceries to his stock, and claimed to carry “cheese, chains, clams, clothing, crackers, cranberries, crowbars, and cutlery.” (I guess if you wanted dresses, decoys, dentures, diapers, Doritos, dillweed, doo-hickeys, and Drambuie you were out of luck.)
One guy was looking for a big and beautiful lady, which ruled me out, another wanted to meet Asian ladies, which also ruled me out ... so two left.
June 19 Nashville, TN Bridgestone Arena
Want to learn how to set a table properly, turn a plain napkin into a work of art, create tablescapes that will amaze your guest then head over to Between Naps On The Porch. You will find all that and more. I use it for a reference guide all the time.
2010 was something of a high water mark for me: it was as if a number of energies simultaneously caught fire and delivered a concentrated year of brilliant, memorable theatre. Perhaps inevitably, 2011 has had a feeling of being on the shoulder of a peak, perhaps reinforced by a sense that main stage theatre here is in significant transition. Certainly it's been hard to look towards Sydney and not feel that Sydney main stage theatre has it all over us.
In this CF awareness month it is important to recognize the countless ways that cf affects a life. Whether it is causing grief to a family, diminishing lung function, or silently festering in the bodies of those who have yet to experience some of its worst effects.... cf awareness must be spread. Why? Because the more people who know what a horrible and unfair disease cf is, the more people we have on our team fighting back through supporting research, donating to the cause, and being by our sides in our battle with this illness. This month, I will be handing in my registration for my 2nd Falmouth Road Race running for the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation. I'll run for the people who aren't as lucky as me, I'll run for my future and for the future of all CFers, and I'll run as a way of showing cf that we aren't giving up.
In other words, it pretty much is a conflict of interest for agents to be both an agent and an ePublisher as they may want their clients to publish with them instead of with some other ePublisher.
10. yeah, an iPad would be great
Just so you fuckers can have this song in your heads, here it is:
It’s a really comfort to know that the people who travel to this restroom in the SFO bathroom are made aware of the dementors.
hhmmm What else is there..... need to find my list!!!!! Too many things - will be back :)
So thank you, Dr. King, for paving the path for my family to "be who we are meant to be".
I shouldn't complain... once the sun begins to shine well it really means time for some spring cleaning. Those winter skies certainly hide the dust bunnies and the plain old dust well... Once the sun starts streaming in the window I can't pretend I don't see the streaks and dog nose prints on the windows...
result: longer legs, uniform light, a less distracting background
I collect pieces with character to use as snowman hats...
Solution: Reversed car, found a patch of sunshine, and parked car. When I moved the car I saw the water had frozen making the driveway dangerously slippery. That's it then. I've had enough.
The easiest way to summarize the Bible’s teaching on sexuality is to begin with God’s blessing of sex only within the marriage covenant between a man and a woman. Then, just remember that sex outside of that covenant relationship, whatever its form or expression, is explicitly forbidden. Christians know that these prohibitions are for our good and that rejecting them is tantamount to a moral rebellion against God Himself. We also know that the Bible forbids all same-sex sexual acts and behaviors. Thus, we know that homosexuality is a sin, that blessing it in any way is also sin, and that normalizing sin cannot lead to human happiness.
plus shipping..
Keep stirring, and occasionally dab down pan sides with a wet brush. Allow 5 to 7 minutes of rapid boiling and stirring. To test if jam has set , place a little on your dish from the freezer.
1 june
Ability to instantly
come, take me away
You can NOT pay bills online like we're used to in Finland. You can see only your saldos online, that's it.
Probably modernity established by Louis 14th, and then the one established by Napoleon 1st. He changed a lot of things. France was also the country where we created the copyrights. And our Revolution inspired a lot of countries...
“Hey big guy. Why don’t you climb off the car, get in the back seat, and we’ll have breakfast together. If you promise not to eat Melvin, I might even turn on the air-conditioning. Sorry about that global warming thing. Wait a minute. I almost forgot. Do you think you may be interested in buying some of my fantastic products and services?”
On the Continent, those who escaped the Roman conquests and socialization were no match for the Inquisition. To survive, the Celtic practitioners of ancient arts and sciences were amalgamated into the Christian Churches that controlled some level of political and policy making authority. It was the only way the Celtic beliefs and traditions could survive; to enter into the belly of the beast and be as one. We have seen, however, how the age old arts lived on to some extent as they were passed from generation to generation, albeit in a more subdued and hidden manner. Yet the origins of the arts were lost. The traditions that remained between mother and daughter were not shared beyond the immediate family members.
While I was digging around in the Bremond files at the Austin History Center I came across the transcript of a threatening note Eugene Bremond once received, a note made all the more interesting by the fact I could find out nothing else about it or what happened as a result of it. I reproduce the note in its entirety, spelling errors intact:
Despite the fact that I've written for the past few years about how being imperfect is both understandable and okay, I still beat myself up a bit on the bad days. You'd think I would have learned by now, but life is simply not so neat as to always be reflective of steps forward, or even staying in neutral. Sometimes life is a few steps back, as well.
I might even try the post a day and incorporate a more popular blog I write on my personal social networks: Word of the Day.
This is something I struggle with from time to time...I feel I am not living to my true potential or up to my true and complete happiness. I have relationship issues, can't seem to find a job that is a "fit" for me, sometimes am still overly tired (I am still anemic, and I still have a few other deficiencies as well) and sometimes still don't feel as good as I believe I should.
Columbia University has announced the 2012 Pulitzer Prize winners — and they include Afghan photographer Massoud Hossaini, whose picture of a girl reacting to a suicide bombing took the title in the category of breaking news photography.
Are they members of the family of nations at all? Would a human being stab a three-month-old baby girl in her sleep and kill a tender four-year-old child sleeping peacefully in his bed next to his parents’ bedroom? (...)
Daniels is the grandson of Christian Syrian immigrants who were purged from their homeland by Muslims in the early 1900s. While he is of Arab descent, he is Christian and American. Many other Syrians were purged from their country at that time, many of them settled in Indiana, many have made great contributions to this nation.
For some reason there’s a lot of tension between the two brothers. The older brother doesn’t want to admit that he “lost” to his younger brother, and his first reaction is to point out everything that’s wrong in Hibito’s house. This annoys Hibito and obviously he makes himself look pretty stupid in the process.
Although the high grades Dawn had been predicted to achieve in her early childhood were no longer possible, she did manage to get five GCSEs.
UB – Un buffered B series
are consuming,
is an embarrassment to her five daughters. She's a "cougar" mom. Well, you see, Joleen had this thing about men. She really goes for them, the young ones too. After knocking around for a while, she comes to the conclusion something is missing in her life. She decides to find a steady fella. She sets her sights for Sam in the delivery bay where she works. All the better, he seems to have an eye for her. But then there's the self-defense instructor, the teacher from her English Lit class, and the lingerie salesman. Of course, the motor cycle stunt man is way too hot to pass up. As if things weren't complicated enough, in walks her ex-husband just released from prison and he wants revenge not only on Joleen but on the five girls as
F r e e
But that always makes me feel
Today's photos are from March 1969, and they feature two beautiful steam locomotives used in the recreation of the famous Golden Spike ceremony that took place when the transcontinental railroad was completed May 10, 1869 - 100 years before these pictures were shot!
(What am I saying...she is graduating high school this year...but in my mind, she is still a little bitty fourth grader. Good God, I'm old.)
J'aimerais vous aviser qu'il s'est glissé une erreur dans le billet original pour le défi #FF23 (Candy Dots). La date limite pour soumettre vos projets aurait dû lire "3 mai 2012" et non "10 mai 2012". Même si nous avons déjà retenu 2 gagnantes, nous accepterons vos projets pour le défi commandité jusqu'au 10 mai 2012 à 23h59 pour trouver nos 3 autres gagnantes. Cela n'affecte d'aucune façon le défi #FF24 qui est dû le 17 mai. Désolée pour la confusion!
*Email a publicity picture and personal “blurb” to a festival organiser.
Waste Land is soulful. "Soul," not as: that which might get to heaven by the grace of God. No, "soul," as in: of the people, by the people and for the people; here, now and most of all, tomorrow. The achievement in the present that the film shows is truly inspiring. It delivers a promise for the future. This is not just your run-of-the-mill human interest story at the end of the evening news, a smear of feel-good icing on top of the nihilistic cake served up by the media to keep everyone "informed," that is, personally terrified, socially alienated and politically lame. No. Waste Land gives hope.
Meet on the ledge, we're gonna meet on the ledge
Kareena Kapoor has bagged the role of a great Hollywood icon, Marilyn Monroe, and would she do justice to role will be seen later on. Infact it will be a role inspired by the legendary actress in Madhur Bhandarkar's untitled project.
What Irish crime novel would make a great movie?
Happy Sunday stampers! It is time for another challenge from Stampin' Sisters in Christ, wehre all of our challenges are based upon scripture. This week our sponsor is The Craft's Meow, you can find more information about TCM on the main page, and see the other creations by the design team.
In 2010, I found myself again living in New York (this time, in Brooklyn), just like I had promised Levon I would. One day, via the internet, where I had friended Levon on Facebook, I discovered that a documentary about his comeback was definitely afoot. In the interim, Levon had released one record called Dirt Farmer, and another, Electric Dirt, which would win the first ever Grammy for Best Americana Album. He'd win another one for his live 2011 release Ramble at the Ryman. The new documentary was humorously called Ain't In It For My Health: A Film About Levon Helm--a title that had Levon's fingerprints all over it. But Steve's name was not connected to it, and I still wonder how that makes him feel.
These changes I propose would involve one or more amendments to the State Constitution and would undoubtedly meet strong resistance in the New Jersey Legislature.
Anyway, these blackforest cupcakes tasted divine. They had good texture and moistness by adding 2 tablespoons of cherry brandy (Kirsch) in the cake mixture which made a good recipe even better!
Best laptime 1m24.480s at 12:30
The media feeds the public half-truths, constantly fills in the blanks, and rarely retracts un-truths about people, most importantly, police officers. There are people who shouldn’t be police officers; let those officers be judged by their own actions. Or, if you choose to believe the bad, then also believe all the good.
The fact that I can still remember the day I saw pictures of a newborn Prince William in his beautiful mother's arms.........
of those incomprehensible words now.
And having just read this back I realise that while Janie wanted a post about intimacy I have in fact just written a post about sex.
Beneath the mountian
May the Holy Week bless us all with some holiness!
His professional eagle eyes had spotted my Epson printer and that was the start of our conversation and later – the deal.
And a very happy Handy Hippo Thursday to you all wherever you are. Here in my particular corner of paradise it's a bright shiny day, although a tad colder (3°C/42°F) than it's been of late. And this, while the rest of the UK seems to be suffering Arctic conditions! It's such a pity that the warm weather hasn't continued because now we are into the Easter break. Egg hunts are not quite the fun they should be in the snow :(
He’s standing proudly next to an anaesthesia machine, which he keeps in pristine condition despite the ubiquitous red Ugandan dust. It makes a very useful table for his Lifebox oximeter, but not much more. All of the dials are in Italian.
12. Salt as per taste.
But you do want people to like your work so it's all pretty cunfusing.
Celebrating the 50th anniversary of the opening of the Second Vatican Council, out of the spirit of which in 1968 a group of Roman students led by Andrea Riccardi, the present Italian Minister for International Cooperation, founded the Community of Sant’Egidio, the community yesterday also celebrated its 44th birthday. Cardinal William Joseph Levada, the Prefect of the Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith, presided an impressive eucharistic liturgy on this occasion at the Lateran Basilica, attended by about 60 catholic bishops, several leaders of other churches and religions and hundreds of friends of the community. This was followed by a reception for all in the Lateran Palace, home of the popes for about 1000 years, with its beautiful wall and ceiling frescoes.
show details 12/16/09
are becoming big girls.
Supplies Used: Heidi Swapp chipboard Invisibles, My Minds Eye Love Nest PP, Basic Grey Doilies, Glimmer Mist- Black Cherry, Turquoise Blue, Pink Bubblegum, Tim Holtz Mask, Tim Holtz Grungeboard- Heart, Fancy Pants Felt Shapes, Prima Bling, Basic Grey Chipboard Chick, American Crafts Thickers, My Little Shoebox Mini Alphas, Distress Ink- Walnut Stain, Zing Embossing Powder- Pink Glitter, Shimmerz Blingz-Pixie Dust, Bazzill CS Strips, American Crafts brown Marker
Into the arms of the Antichrist
So I do my best to focus on what I can control.
He WILL get me back…
A huge thank you also to our sponsors for giving us such fab prizes to give away.
6) Rodeo Man
Cups and Cakes
13. My mother taught me the CIRCLE OF LIFE.
After school, Daphne has to go to the orthodontist, then she has to sit through her little brothers’ soccer practice, which is incredibly boring. It doesn’t help that her parents ask how her first day of school went. Daphne does not want to talk about her dreadful day, she wants to “forget” what happened as soon as possible. She would even prefer to listen to her father’s boring account of his day rather than have to talk about hers.
Whilst I cannot for one moment accept that He would single out commuters for a single act of retribution in this way, it is clear that the train operating company believes the fault lies with our Lord and Master.
9:25 find the make shift entrance, get pj out of the car and head on in to pay the bill. dang, presley is in christmas jammies and it's all ready 97 degrees out and what month is this, august now.. oh well! I probably shoud have brushed her hair, it' standing up. mom of the year here!
I was so excited, but you know how it goes… After you feel that you are heading in the right direction, something (or someone) tries to throw you off the right path.
Sharing the winning ticket were John Hilton, 57, John Kutey, 54, Gabrielle Mahar, 29, Tracy Sussman, 41, Kristin Baldwin, 42, Leon Peck, 62, and Mike Barth, 63.
Two nights later we see the Turners camped at the base of the hill where the robbery took place and they are commenting that the campfire on top of the hill is back, even though they have doused it four nights in a row. It spooks them that the kid comes back every night to relight the fire, but they can never find him.
I still have two in my posession, I can't tell you off the top of my head which ones, though I think one of them is Harry's.
TH: So we both make a few more moves but at some point we diverge. We take different roads. Ok?
In spite of all his ability and all this terrific work to his name, a health crisis has left Tom in financial peril. I've donated what I can, and the only other thing I have to offer is trying to raise awareness. The comic book business has been pretty hard on a lot of people who worked on comics I loved, and pretty hard on friends of mine who were employed by it. Tom is both of those, and you'll understand I get kinda tired of watching it happen. Read this post at Daniel Best's blog and see what you think.
Putting the rouge back into my cheeks.
*K is growing like a weed (though on the small side for her age) and getting stronger. She does well with her braces and I really think it's improving her leg/ankle strength. I am glad we got her signed up for physical therapy.
- green and grey –
~I miss you
Now honestly? I never ever would have thought about signing up for this. I already have family and friends I would like to see more of, and never seem to find the time for. So new people? Strangers? Umm…don’t think so.
I was teaching at the University of Maryland while in Graduate School, one of my best students, Jim Wine, now a long-time friend, took a couple of my courses, including a course I was teaching for the German department on Scandinavian fiction and another on Avant-Garde American Fiction. One day, he stopped by my office to talk to me. He was in quandary. His girlfriend, whom he declared he loved, was being sent back to Sweden, her Green Card having expired. Even with the help of his ex-ambassador father, they could not convince the authorities to let her stay. What was he to do? If he stayed in school to finish his degree, he might possibly lose her forever, but if he did follow her to Sweden, he might be unable to finish his education.
That magical second kid, though...it's not like you get doubly busy. It's like you get quadruply busy. Yes, quadruply. And, your cute little Mommy Brain forgetfulness turns into full-blown I'm-a-moron-and-I-would-forget-to-wipe-my-ass-if-it-wasn't-for-the-toilet-paper-roll-next-to-the-seat idiocy.
And finally, to all Canadians: Canada is a great country, one of the hopes of the world. We can be a better one – a country of greater equality, justice, and opportunity. We can build a prosperous economy and a society that shares its benefits more fairly. We can look after our seniors. We can offer better futures for our children. We can do our part to save the world’s environment. We can restore our good name in the world. We can do all of these things because we finally have a party system at the national level where there are real choices; where your vote matters; where working for change can actually bring about change. In the months and years to come, New Democrats will put a compelling new alternative to you. My colleagues in our party are an impressive, committed team. Give them a careful hearing; consider the alternatives; and consider that we can be a better, fairer, more equal country by working together. Don’t let them tell you it can’t be done.
I like collecting clothes.
and it was really hard to pick what was good to post
Tomorrow the world will also be watching as some of those protesters seek to exercise their right to freedom of speech and expression and march through Kuching. As usual the authorities are abusing their power by refusing permission and banning the Red Marchers. MoCS President Francis Siah, was arrested on arrival at the airport yesterday and told to present himself at the police station today. He is bravely determined to go ahead and urges everyone in Sarawak to find something red to wear tomorrow.
So in "making it better" the second time around, I wanted to take this feedback on board and seperate the two characters from each other for the reader, while still keeping a sense of mystery around the story. I'm not sure if the mystery is still there, maybe you can tell me, but I do feel that the characters are more seperate now. What do you think? To keep them anonymous, I have used a very basic descriptor for one character - "the short man" -, and then I stumbled a bit with what to do for the main character, as "he" or "him" still didn't work even with "the short man" identified. So I decided to change the viewpoint altogether to be in the second person, a style I have been meaning to try out and which worked well for other WoWers in their pieces for the original "Who are the people in your neighbourhood?" prompt.
I am scrubbing down the chicken coop.
The Raffle was drawn and raised £29.00.
So I woke up today and said, “Today is the day!!!!”
experience negative emotions but do not display any behavioral signs. For instance, some of us try to show strength rather than crying when we are sad. Unfortunately, when using suppression, we are so focused on not showing any signs of our discomfort that it actually causes us more rather than less
That Friday after work, as I drove over to pick her up I was a bit nervous.
56. Farewell to Arms, A: Ernest Hemingway
All started out relatively well, but the first exercise was killing me with all of the jumping. My knees are relatively weak, so I didn’t make it past the first 10 jumps. I modified a few times, and ended up feeling best with standing, going down into a squat, picking up the bag, then pressing up and going back into the lunge. This was way easier on my knees. The jumps were too much today.
TV show (Netflix show)- Outsourced, Iron Monkey
Aerosmith
End unit two level town home available in a popular Durham community. 3 beds, 2.5 baths, gas log fireplace, dining area, separate master bathtub and shower. Some TLC needed but would be a great opportunity for both owner occupants and investors. Sold as-is. Convenient to shopping, dining, and local amenities.
Super Natural Healthy Cookies
When we heard about this house, we jumped. "Yes!" we exclaimed. "What we need is a smaller house with fewer bathrooms that's covered in graffiti, full of garbage, and needs a shit ton of work!"
Doubajen Records Announce Slim K New Single ‘You Love It’ – Available Worldwide Tuesday, May 8Th 2012
Then I… Well, I- Um…
A basic description of what I’m doing will help in understanding the stats below. I’m looking at best book winners in awards for the following genres: children’s literature, mystery, horror, science fiction and fantasy. I’m only considering a subset of awards for each category, and I’m limiting them geographically to awards presented to authors writing in English in North America, the UK or Canada. I’m ignoring all categories that aren’t novel-length, or are awarded for first-time efforts.
And even if those responsible just really and truly didn’t know any better – I can’t imagine that someone that DID know better didn’t advise them against it, and advise them to wait.
The piece, titled 'Anomaly' was inspired by a song by Incubus called 'Anna Molly,' and in my opinion was rather juvenile.
for all to breathe with lungs of dearth
Please email me and I will give you all the details. Remember to tell me about any months/dates that are not suitable for you so I can quickly work out dates for everyone.
Later that day at dinnertime Olivia and Andy sat next to each other. Andy would sometimes reach over and caress Olivia’s leg or arm. If she was bothered by it, she certainly didn’t show it.
Censored! – Astro’s doctored report!
Blood-shot eyes and soaked through, slipping, then upright, not fully because as he tries to meet the challenge the wind signals its anger at such a show of defiance and pummels his body into bended submission.
Bulawayo – ANC secretary-general Gwede Mantashe yesterday pledged the ANC’s support to Zanu-PF for the national elections in Zimbabwe, expected to take place next year.
Gosh I sure had a lot to say with this post .. I hope it makes a little bit of since and not just thrown together. Here I go again, why do I care what other people think? This is my Blog ... I'm writing my thoughts. :)
Funny thing is, I don't feel that I should worry about the reply to the question because this - this blog - is supposed to be warts and all (Ed: you can get cream for that). Yet here I am dilly-dallying around the answer because... because I'm... embarrassed by the answer. Deep breath.
Although ski gear isn't my favourite attire, there really isn't anything quite like the feeling you get when your skiing down the slopes.
Ps 30:5 Weeping may endure for a night, but joy comes in the morning.
They have several colors to choose from.
Hope everyone is having a good week! It is going to be in the 70s here tomorrow. CRAZY!
...which is run by Peter Kellner, who sits on the board of ASH. Does ASH have any evidence that is not directly or indirectly supplied by people who are members of their organisation?
Damn.
The problem with this film isn’t that it’s not good, because it’s a very good flick, it’s just that it’s very hard to actually care what happens. Yes, I did like this story and where it went with its direction but when it came to actually having some sympathy for these characters, there just wasn’t anything touching me at all. Ed, our central character, is a pretty numbed-out dude that doesn’t talk much and doesn’t really have many emotions in this flick and it’s hard to connect with somebody like that considering it seems like he doesn’t really care all that much either about what’s going on with his life and where it’s taking him. His wife, Doris, also seems like she doesn’t have much going for her life other than running around on her husband which makes it even harder for us to care and even Big Dave has dreams but even those are pretty boring and mediocre. Basically, it’s a film that you can try your hardest to like and connect to one of these characters, but in the end, it’s just going to come off as empty.
Now, I’m not appalled at any campaign using half-truths, it is a fact of political life. I am appalled at the President of the United States politicizing this issue. Then again, what should we expect from the man known as “the campaigner in chief?” The President’s conduct has become so questionable liberal columnist Dana Milbank is raising his concerns:
I met the man I’m going to marry.
Treatment related mortality overall for the aggressive approach I took is around 1 percent, but that includes many elderly patients. For somebody my age, it is probably more like 1 in 1000. Those odds are good...unless you are that one. And when you encounter that one, it can be jarring.
Imagine living in a society governed by fear: fear of the authorities, fear of your fellow citizens’ covert suspicions and overt accusations, fear of having even your most decent human impulses twisted into an unthinkable crime.
Moving is one thing, but moving home and a pottery studio is another.
is reach for a pen
This has stayed with me for many years and has seemed to have a radiant quality about it, almost to the point that I think of the white horse in the dream as my talisman. I have thought long and hard about what this dream could mean in my life and have come up with some satisfactory answers. I was once driving along familiar roads and saw, in a meadow on the left side of the road, five white horses grazing. You can imagine I almost drove right off the road. I remember writing a poem about them then, but I’d have to look it up.
Me: Well, I Hope you know that cats are very sensitive, and they might die now.
Asshole
I miss my size 6 clothing, almost everyday, and that's okay...
My wife returns from a trip across town. She reports light traffic, the usual numbers of police on the streets, and occasional glimpses of military vehicles. The cab driver charged extra because of the rising cost of fuel.
I spent most of yesterday afternoon on the phone with Dell Tech Support ... first with 'Jason' who passed me off to 'Sean' for some 'diagnostic testing' ... and while I was running those tests on the 1720, I ran them on the old 9100. Apparently it's my hard drive that has 'failed' and if I want to replace it, I can do so for about $70 ... upgrading from a 60GB drive to a 160GB drive. I'm thinking about it ... but am wondering what ELSE might fail on the older laptop if I replace the drive.
The deluded join hand in hand with the deluded. They band together to speak against the upright in heart and strengthen their delusion. But God says:
Both kids are learning responsibilities around the house. We started Responsibility charts last week. It's been GREAT with Jadyn and a work in progress with Eli. He is learning that to get the sticker reward, he has to actually clean up his toys. :)
At the weekend we tried something new, we made a Gingerbread house! The baking, building and decorating took us 3 days, we baked it on day 1 (Saturday) built it on day 2 and for fear of it collapsing, we saved the decorating until Halloween itself. For a first attempt, Im pretty pleased with it, although the perfectionist in me had a hard time allowing the kids anywhere near it once the roof was on. Emy is keen to give it another go next year :-)
As I prepare for race day I start to pay more attention to what is going down my tubes. I realize it is a little early for the sodium filled V8 but I was having a craving so I had to go for it. I will drink another one on Saturday. Want to get me some sodium because it is supposed to get up to 70 and sunny on Sunday.
SintBernardus.be
NOTHING is sacred.
Another pet peeve of mine is hearing parents say the words– You’re a good girl/boy or bad girl/boy
but for a while, and to our mutual chagrin,
When gods in their womb dreamt of a singular life in the dipole of a river
Now, how about a nice, big, steaming hot cup of STFU?
So on Monday night when I went downstairs to get on my bike I had to put it back on the trainer. I tried and tried to put it back on Jason's but I just couldn't. So I brushed the cobwebs off of mine and slotted my bike in there.
The saddest aspect of this saga is the pitiful report of the Human Rights Commission, which is full of the factual inaccuracies required to reach the conclusion that the Council violated the human rights of the residents of Makhaza. It is the clearest possible demonstration of what happens when the ANC deploys its parliamentary cadres into institutions that are supposed to be independent of the ruling party. They become extensions of its power abuse instead of limits on its power.
Reporting 1/J361 Your name:
2) Coffee shop
-Being on your tummy for too long.
By 1861 they had moved back to London, Emma described herself as a house proprietor and George, then aged 14, was working as a miniature painter. He disappears from view for a decade or so, although a girl he later claimed as his daughter was born at Ashburton, Devon in late 1866.
The figures in 2009, state, 400 Americans have more wealth than half of all Americans. Much like in Cairo, and in London, and in Athens-the protests are about too many Have Nots.
I spent a whole day recently being completely naked. Loose. Cannon.
To begin with, even the most casual fan could have made the first two picks: Andrew Luck to the Colts and Robert Griffin III to the Redskins.
the session ended eventually, we all walked out of the meeting room. at the outside, everybody was congratulating with each other and almost everyone said that "wow, it was a quick!" with reliefs.
More about Mary:
We hope to be able to conduct a seamless migration; shutting down for maintenance some time late Friday night or Saturday (at the latest. We may do it overnight on a weeknight if we're ready earlier), completing a migration of the forum and database to that point, throwing DNS over and then going live on the new servers.
Having spent most of my wine-drinking life within the pleasantly diverse confines of the Gallic hexagon, I still get a thrill from forays into the beyond. Oh! A Ridge Zinfandel! A Nikolaihof Grüner Veltliner! Dry furmint from Hungary!
Cronenberg revisits subjects that fascinate him: how the organic and the psychological are inextricably intertwined, society’s anxieties and phobias, and letting repressed impulses and paranoia run wild. COSMOPOLIS is a culmination of his masterpieces that addresses the alarming global financial crisis of today’s world.
About 3 or so weeks ago Erin and I made a trip to Kohl’s to check out what was new from Lauren Conrad. We ended up in the Juniors section and yes, I bought a pair of jeans from Candie’s. During the trip I also tried on a scalloped lace skort (oh yeahhhh). It looked silly, we laughed….
HELD: The SC ruled that Act 1639 is valid for it met the requisites of a reasonable classification. The SC emphasized that it is not enough that the members of a group have the characteristics that distinguish them from others. The classification must, as an indispensable requisite, not be arbitrary. The requisites to be complied with are;
I have a thing for Jello. I've loved it since I was a kid. It was early "cooking" - hey, you learn how to measure water and stir! And patience as you waited for the Jello to set. So, I wanted to make a Christmas-themed Jello dish.
Yesterday, I felt the need for a little date night with my now bf Z. I wasn't really tying it in to Jonny's birthday, since that's today, but we ended up going to see Act of Valor. It might not have been the best idea considering his birthday was the next day and it was extremely emotional (I was wailing in the theatre - more on my opinion of the movie later). I wasn't quite ready to go home after being shaken up, so Z and I went to a local bar for some food and drink. As the hours ticked away to Jonny's birthday I kept thinking of how we might have been spending it. It actually seemed like a fitting evening. A local country band was playing in the bar just by chance, and minutes before midnight they sang Toby Keith's "Courtesy of the Red, White, and Blue," a song I used to YELL and Jonny would comment about how motarded I am and that he's surprised I don't have a high-and-tight - a song that definitely reminds me of Jonny and the laughter we shared. After midnight, Z went up and asked the band if they'd do a shoutout for Jonny, which they did. It was really nice of him to acknowledge it was my husband's birthday. And it was definitely a way I could see spending his birthday if he were here to spend it with. I certainly felt his presence with me!
Visits to Daoud the tailor, Kabé the jeweler,
Parents have no bounds when it comes to doing anything and everything they can to ensure the success and popularity of their children. Trust me on this one, I have kids. OK, you got me, I had kids. They’re all young adults now, but I have my memories. If some slick huckster on Madison Avenue implanted the germ of an idea in my head that buying the right mini-van would improve one of my kids chances of scoring a winning goal, you know damn well I would have bought it. Crash rating? We don’t need no stinking crash rating!
So where does this leave us? Well we are still trying to finish the church/school building. We believe that with $45,000 more we will have this building up and serving the people of Monrovia. Right now all the foundation work is done. Our trip has also left us with a hunger to do more for the kingdom of God. We plan to send more medical teams in the future. We also want to help with the local churches to plant more churches and to provide more water systems. We believe that God has called us to be faithful and so we plan to dream big and see what God does. We would love for others to team up with us and do something incredible for the Lord. We would love to hear from you. Maybe God has you reading this post for the very reason of going to Liberia with us or helping us financially finish the building. Who knows but God has His plans. All we have to do is be faithful and He will do the rest.
4 Months 3 Weeks and 2 Days
What’s the nature of this phenomenon? What do I know about fear and laziness? All that I can figure out comes from my understanding of love and will.
Cardigan: Old Navy, altered by me after it faded to the point of being unwearable.
I blame the weather
Satsy attempts to write songs. At this point knows how to play recorder and some musical notation. Nothing ever completed. Nothing survives to present.
Most recently THV performed acoustically at LA’s Thread Fashion Show. Internet site VIMBY enlisted them as veejays for event coverage! Visit here to catch up with them having some fashionable fun: http://vimby.com/video/fashion/us/all/detail/7803
In the last entry we established a focus area to narrow down our intelligence gathering efforts on four types of threats which gave us our “Where”. Those four types of threats and a little research gives us our “Who”. Now we need to look at the “What” aspect of it. There are some very simple questions we’re going to use that may not necessarily have simple answers. Something along the lines of:
i always have from the start
Extra Entries (leave separate comments for each):
This house is often referred to as the Truman Capote house, because the author lived and worked there for a number of years. Capote even wrote about the house and his love for Brooklyn Heights in an essay called “A House on the Heights,” in which he — much to the gratification of all Brooklynites — opened the essay by declaring "I live in Brooklyn. By choice."
One meal a day.
Alyson from craftingtostaysane.blogspot.com is the winner!
As usual, new photos are preferred, but if you have some favorite shots in your archives that you’d love to use, please feel free. April 28th is the due date for this hunt. Please leave a link to your post in the comments of this post. I’d be ever so grateful if you’d help spread the word! Thanks very much and have fun!
This session is designed for experienced Chi Runners who are looking for help refining their technique. The session will include drills designed to cover efficient lean, forward momentum using the lean, pelvic rotation and speed. Questions regarding other aspects of the technique will be welcomed and answered during the session.
Big sigh of relief. The midwife whipped out a doppler and set my mind at ease.
Because I have a great sense of humor. My sense of humor and ability to laugh at myself–a lot–have been a source of endless comfort during this not-so-hot time.
“We know there have been very good research proposals but the heavily laden psychiatric committee embargoes them. Why do psychiatrists have to be involved at all?” Rosie Cox, Cardiff; sick for 41 years
Of course living in New York City it’s not so easy to protect your child from the dark side of life- especially during the Christmas season- you know with all those various members of the wretched of the earth- on the subway for example- excusing themselves for ruining your day, your holiday season— by begging for money or even some food you might have on you and are thinking of throwing away. Sometimes, I feel so bad I even think of reaching deep into my pocket and bringing up some coins but usually can’t because I’m so squeezed in between two people I can’t possibly reach into anywhere without having to stand up and draw attention to myself. So I usually drop the idea.
After lunch, we walked around the area and ended up at the Barefoot bar. We enjoyed our first mai tai's of the trip.
So what if the actual scene looks rather dull? Any way to make it better? Well, there are some ways.
The movie can be seen here at Google Videos. The anecdote comes in between the 36:00 and 38:00 points. It’s the film’s subject describing one of his many difficult and strange experiences while being a heavy user of various drugs.
We call them our family Rules, but they seem pretty universal to me, as each one appears to apply in countless settings. I’m sure my husband and I have unintentionally gleaned them from old, old sayings and philosophies, but put together like this as ours, they feel like ours, comfortable and homegrown enough that we can practice them unselfconsciously. I think that’s partly why we’ve been able to stick with them for seven years now.
Anyway, as we left the theatre, there was a pointed non-look at each other as we exited the row of seats from opposite ends - before fate brought us together once again at the exit. We didn't make eye contact, but then we didn't make eye-contact way back then, either. Ce la vie.
Hy was vriendelik genoeg om ook sy ID te stuur. Nou vertrou ek hom ten volle. So lyk die ID:
Get your crockpot out and grease the bottom with a little butter. (I know, sounds like Paula Dean!)
Over the years, the auto industry has been destroyed by increasing congressional interference in the form of mileage mandates, by requirements for ethanol use, and, internally, by the auto unions that demanded and received huge medical and retirement plans that ate profits. Two of the largest American auto manufacturers are essentially owned by the taxpayers due to massive, multi-billion bailouts, and controlled by the unions that destroyed them.
Nobody wants to entertain the thought that they did ANYTHING wrong. EVER. And if that’s true of most Americans, I imagine not many Israeli are eager to even engage in this thought process, so painful and personal the issue may be. As I said earlier, people are not naturally inclined to understand others, “especially if that person is a stranger and your parents have warned you against him.”
which makes as much sense to me as the electoral college)
We took Boxer with us, and jogged a shorter distance than normal, but still, we jogged. About 2 miles. Maybe a little less. Still, I wasn't really feeling it, so I was proud that I did anything at all. hehe. I was feeling the extra 5-6 lbs I'd picked up since my b-day, and I wasn't liking it. Today was gonna be the first day of no cheats. Sigh. It was kinda getting me down.
Bisou is not a show dog, and I am anything but a show-dog person. Still, of an evening, it is a joy to me to watch all that orange and gold rippling over the grass. But alas, no more. As the first snow balls glommed on to the end of Bisou's hair strands, her running made the hairs twirl around each other, which in turn collected more snow, whose weight caused the hairs to twist more tightly. In a word, her leg feathers were such a mess of mats that in the end I had to play Alexander the Great, and just cut through those evil knots.
Focus on your own needs. Are you taking care of yourself? Your wellness is always important. Watch your stress levels, take time to be with friends, get enough sleep. If you find that your relationship is draining you, consider ending it.
Every few months, use a cotton swab or dry cloth to clean the metal contacts on the battery and the smartphone.
Certainly she was losing consciousness of the outer things. And as she lost consciousness of outer things … her mind kept throwing things up from its depths, scenes, and names, and sayings, and memories and ideas, like a fountain spurting...
One last thought--even if his assumption was correct that there were 2,400 happy authors, does that negate the hardship, pain, and loss of money of the 600 who were scammed? Jones's logic would think so because that's how he conducts his business. It doesn't matter if over 80 people are accusing him of taking their money--he'll have a few dozen state they love him and that makes it okay.
Goldeen can have the Lightningrod ability in Gen V’s Dreamworld. And in Gen V, Lightningrod not only draws electric attacks to the Pokemon, but also grants it immunity as well as raise its Sp Attack. It’s not very useful to raise the Sp Attack of Goldeen, since it’s got a lot more Attack stat than Sp Attack stat (I’ve killed lots of Goldeens when EV training for Attack), but immunity against electric attacks does nullify one of its weaknesses.
Telegraph readers already know about the "shale gas revolution" that has turned America into the world’s number one producer of natural gas, ahead of Russia.
After talking to her for a few minutes about the position, I told her YES! This was a job that my friend "A" heard about from her friend "L". "L" had worked with a friend "G" for a while and "G" later took a new job at a different office but "G" and "L" still stayed in touch. (Are you following me here?) So, "G" had been at her new job for about a year. "G" is pregnant and decided that she would be staying at home with her baby instead of returning to work, so she was helping in the search to find her replacement so that person could start early enough so "G" could train them.
As Yvette and Haven try to escape their prison and rescue the actress and Haven's brother, will their natural hatred for each other keep them apart or is the passion that bubbles up between them strong enough for them to dare risk their lives to defeat the witch from harnessing the greatest power of all?
wash away the shame.
This is an area of Kuechly’s game that is hard to grade not because he can’t blitz but just because he wasn’t asked to do this all too often at Boston College. Kuechly does lack some athleticism and his closing burst is just average at this point. However, Kuechly does do a good job of making plays behind the line of scrimmage and knows how to shoot gaps. It will be interesting to see how or if Kuechly will be used as a pass rusher, which my guess would be not. His main strengths include helping out in the run and pass game, however he is a much better coverage player than true threat to get after the quarterback. Kuechly probably wont make too many sacks in his career but he shows above average awareness, instincts, and hustle which should allow him to make some splash plays behind the line of scrimmage from time to time.
To Americans, a Yankee is a Northerner.
“All in all, the creative act is not performed by the artist alone; the spectator brings the work in contact with the external world by deciphering and interpreting its inner qualifications and thus adds his contribution to the creative act. This becomes even more obvious when posterity gives its final verdict and sometimes rehabilitates forgotten artists.”
Elizabeth Massie – Forever, Amen
They laughed and hugged each other, struggling to believe that the house with the sweeping gravel drive and wisteria covered frontage was really theirs.
In an indictment filed before the Chicago court, federal prosecutors said that the Lashkar operative, on the direction of his LeT handlers, changed his name from Daood Gilani to David Coleman Headley, on February 15, 2006, in Philadelphia, enabling him to present himself in India as an American who was neither Muslim nor Pakistani.
If you’ve scrolled down this far, you’ve clearly already taken the Who are You, Literally? quiz, therefore I’ll give a brief explanation of these pictures. I have a startling tendency to turn into someone completely different from my normal self when I’m upset. I become irritable, short-tempered, unforgiving, and in general: a GRUMPS. This is a rare sighting of Grumps because normally he only comes around when I’m hungry or tired. In this case though, I was so outraged by WordPress, Grumps honestly took control. I wasn’t myself when I did these things. I was Grumps.
happy mother's day to my mommas out there!! xoxo
Day 6 today is '5pm'.
I see their legs in miniskirts, slacks, wavy fabrics.
When does it stop sucking when other people say their pregnant? It seriously sends me into a downward sprial of self loathing, and then I am so envious of the person announcing that I can't even speak to them. It's like if you only fucking knew. Then I hold my breath around 20 weeks to see if what happened to me will happen to anyone else I know ever.... and nope. Nothing. Everything goes perfectly. Worse is when they bitch and moan about being pregnant. You know what? fuck you, shut the fuck up and deal with it. It's uncomfortable I know, but you know what's worse, being in my position. I'd rather be uncomfortable for years if it meant I get a baby than be in my position any day. Facebook is evil for women who have suffered the unspeakable loss of a child or in my case children.
It is difficult to believe that Bishop Sutton and his task force are not aware of this development and the attitude of the Russian Orthodox Church toward ecumenism. Why then are they seeking the GAFCON Primates’ acceptance of the dropping of the Filoque clause from the Nicene Creed?
Record your dreams in a journal and make a positive intention to remember your dreams before you fall asleep. These dream memories may only be a sentence long at first but they are very important to remember. When you sleep, your physical eyes and analytical minds are turned off. You are closest to the natural psychic you.
Happiness is much sought after by people.
Gas Grills Reviews Reviews (gasgrillsreviewsreviews.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Protect and Enforce
The film is weaker on plot than it is on dialogue, action of (admittedly comic-book) character. The heroes obey comic book law by getting into petulant fist-fights with each other, which is fine, and there’s a lot of gamma-irradiated dick-measuring going on, but at the moment they manage to figure out the Hulk’s role in the villains’ masterplan, they really should have acted more rapidly to get him out of harm’s way. There are a few things like that.
This is one of many orphaned postcard donated by Katie in Washington, who writes the blog Red Tin. She recently posted an interview with a mail carrier, who also happens to be a fiber artist, like Katie.
I have to make these in every fabric Stampin' Up! do now as I jut love them to bits. Don't forget the fabric owl PDF tutorial is available in my side bar if you want to make one of these yourself.
I’d love to say I have the solution to these buggers but this is more a post of things I’ve tried that didn’t work in hopes of other suggestions.
This age must surely represent
Perhaps I didn't jinx myself after all.
Time frame to claim your prize is by 19th March 2012. After this date the prize is forfeited.
The Acoustic Roots Music Festival will be held at Upland Brewing Company on Saturday, May 12. It’s a family-friendly event with a line-up of incredible local Bloomington artists. This event is a fundraiser for WFHB and tickets are only $10. Contact Mike at 812-325-5035 or mike@visitbloomington.com to get tickets.
In the months before and after September 11, 2001, the United States was bombarded with a series of cyber attacks. A group of criminals exposed vulnerabilities in the Microsoft operating system, and created a buffer overflow virus, which executed arbitrary code and infected hundreds of thousands of computers. By July 19, 2001, the amount of infected hosts reached over 350,000 zombies. A series of separate viruses named Code Red I and Code Red II crippled valuable servers and made calculated attacks on US government computers.
I called the house Dewell Manor. Originally, I thought it would be fun to use my own name for the house, but Giacomo Dell'accio just sounded wrong for an english manor house. So after looking up popular victorian names, I decided to use the maiden name of one of my favorite people in the world, the mother of one of our dearest friends from Manchester UK, Yvonne Dewell. I thought Dewell Manor (pronounced duel) had a beautiful ring to it and she was kind enough to let me use it. She also helped me with the story behind the family.
I hope you're inspired to make a mini quilt just for fun, too!
His bosom fixation is far from being the queerest of his peccadilloes. Apparently, the doctor is an avid amateur knife-thrower, believing his professional activities give him a special aptitude for the pursuit.
Goodbye Alf Ramsey
The lender is expected to shrink this inventory. As of June 1, severely aged outstanding repurchase requests cannot exceed 10% of the total, and by July 1, it must drop to below 5%, according to the PHH filing.
The optional rules cover several subjects, one of which is no less than an alternative approach to the command system at the heart of the game. It removes the random element completely, as well as the need for division, eliminating the fractions and the problems they can bring. How you feel about this will depend on how you feel about chance in wargames in general. For me, a healthy dose of frustrated plans is a good thing, but I appreciate the speed of the new approach. The alternative also includes a simple rule for taking rank into account, which ought to mean fun as losses start to tell.
From Lachish Joshua passed to Eglon, and all Israel with him; and they encamped against it and fought against it. They took it on that day and struck it with the edge of the sword; all the people who were in it he utterly destroyed that day, according to all that he had done to Lachish.
And to the people behind @riotcleanup I say bravo, you are true heroes and have engendered some of the most remarkable scenes of human strength, fortitude and beauty I've ever witnessed too - the brooms being held aloft around Clapham as hundreds took the streets to clean up the mess the thugs had left is still bringing tears to my eyes.
So, does that mean that 4 billion a month will be pumped back in the good old U.S.of A? I sure hope so. I hope that money is not diverted to another military action in yet another country that we feel we have to police. It seems to me that the good citizens of many countries are tired of being repressed, dictated to, and lied to. Including us. Occupy Wall Street has popped up in many places, including Chicago. People are tired of not having a say in matters of importance. In fact, I think millions and millions would join me in saying:
Cigars, on the other hand, correspond to the spirited part of the soul. This explains their traditional popularity among men seeking honor or reputation—politicians, executives, etc. The reason for this correspondence can be found in the similarity between cigars and ambition. A cigar is visually impressive: with its large size and great billows of smoke, it often leaves a greater impact on the spectator than on the smoker. Further, a cigar is phallic—not with regard to male lust, but to male power. “Testis” in Latin means “witness”: the phallic status of the cigar is meant to bear public witness to the smoker’s prominence, his virility. The fact that a cigar is not inhaled reflects this external focus.
Joe Jackson Is she really going out with him? US
HOW HE CELEBRATES HIS REDEMPTION: yells "Merry Christmas" at random strangers , throws coins at people, wisely chooses not to sing
Outside the nightclub, I'm suffering from smoke inhalation. 1ne brave member of the hens party has managed to retrieve a shoe from the wreckage, and she holds it aloft triumphantly, the high heel shimmering in the moonlight. I smile meekly in appreciation, because I'm bewildered and unsure of where I am. The fairy liquid is kicking in after all. My friend is bouncing around in a hyperactive new relationships are boss kind of way, and I'm eating a chip that I believe was dug out of a labyrinthe pit of pure grease at some point in 1984 and left to sit on a bed of oil ever since. I'm sitting in the gutter eating this chip, studying it in fascination, because anything is better than eating it. Even the DJ has left by know - we watched him leave, he seemed smaller somehow, as if he had assumed a character before, and without his whistle and ability to yell he was without soul or purpose. He slumped over his record crate as he loaded into his van and launched the most mournful sigh imaginable into the night air. I sympathise to some extent with people who spend just a brief moment of exaltation as a wacky character then go back to, I don't know, a typing pool - I used to live with a girl who was the Chickenfeed Chicken, and when the costume was hung on the rack, it was so lifeless it was sad. I presume he had to go home to prepare for his stint at Hospital Radio. We waited a long time for a taxi as it happens, until the hens part left, leaving behind the infamous shoe in the gutter, departing in a swirl of casual vomit, glitter, floods of tears and 1ne of the worst attempts to pash a stranger I've seen. The DJ left, driving his mini van crammed with so many records I don't even know how he could see. Hell, even my friend left in the end, pashing her new boyfriend as if she'd just discovered the joys of tongues. And so there I was, alone, under street light, surrounded by the flotsam and jetsam of a night out, under a neon sign that flickered horrendously loudly in my ears, eating a chip that could mostly be described as ambivalent to the notion of taste, with a sticker attached to my shoe for the nightclub that couldn't have been more gaudy, with a taxi on my way that I had no idea that I would be picked up by a taxi driver with a neck the size of Ecuador, who seemed oddly addicted to CDs of impossibly beautiful female singers that didn't match his SICK FUCK tattoo on his knuckles...
In fiction, Lauren is looking for: romance—all genres; literary fiction; commercial fiction, especially up-market urban fantasy with romantic elements; middle-grade—all subgenres; young adult—all subgenres; mystery, with a strong focus on cozies; women's fiction on the literary side; and smart chick lit, a la The Devil Wears Prada. On the nonfiction side, she's looking for memoir, parenting and family, relationships, food and lifestyle, business, popular science, popular culture, and popular psychology.
Whether one of the two paradigms under consideration can be used more confidently than the other as a premise for a ghost show without the risk of confusing a general audience is a judgment you Forgottenistas will have to make for yourselves. In my opinion they're pretty close to a wash in that regard. With a few low-key clues and prompts to the audience, I should think that either one would work.
Their creations deal in different ways with the various themes in Van der Elsken’s book: love, intimacy, voyeurism, the game of truth and fiction, the photographer as narrator, the Internet, found footage, etc. and finally the love of the image.”
If there are people out there who are never torn between competing allegiances I say: that must be nice. I don’t know the exact proportions of political savvy and honest self-searching that emboldened JFK to publically plot out the web of his loyalties, but I believe his example gives us all a model for how to explors those complexities in our own lives – and perhaps a dose of gratitude that most of us won’t have to do so.
Pastis - for simple French.
I love, love, love the control panel and the door handles. I'd be especially interested in learning more about the model names and model numbers.
Everyday Enchantment papers. They are absolutely lushness personified! The keen eyed amongst you will have noticed that they actually match the Fresh Vintage stamp set, so if you can stretch to £90 in sales they can both be yours!
gloom of the grave:
In recent years, when I teach an occasional religion, Christian history or theology class I have noticed a change in how the calendar is depicted in textbooks. The traditional B.C. and A.D. are being replaced with B.C.E. and C.E. There is always the need to draw this change to the students' attention, explain the change and then question and critique the change.
When I walk on by, girls be looking like damn he fly
And who can forget the always quotable Bob Ringma when he said he would “fire” or “move to the back of the shop” a homosexual or member of an ethnic minority whose presence turned off bigoted customers…
I made an error in judgment last month - okay, well I didn't the weather morons got it wrong. It was suppose to increase in temperature by the afternoon and it did not. When the kids left school it was cool, wet, and miserable. And - gasp - shock - they came out of school had to walk 2 whole minutes to get to the car in short sleeve shirts. I hardly think it killed them.
As per Mersc Feond, but reduce damage rolls by two dice, its hit points to 32 and let its armor be 5.
Then you part ways, until the next time.
A ten month experiment in naturalism - specifically in exploring my genetic hair growth patterns unimpeded by social convention or personal intervention - ended today...
Wood: The wood is fine-grained, compact, and easy to work. In Mexico, it is carved into chessmen, toys, small spoons, and other articles.
When I was visiting Japan during a winter break, I saw one of my friends quietly putting his cigaret into a small mobile pocket-ashtray with a neat motion. He is a slender hair stylist, and I still remember that series of motions he took at treating the cigaret because it gave me such a good impression. It is a small motion but it shows consideration for the town and the environment and his delicacy.
I'm cleaning through my drafts & this post has been sitting around for almost a year now.
Dhammapada 129
Unsalted butter, cold and cut into pieces – ½ cup
Prick with the whole cloves.
There is one complication surrounding the term “ethics” that is worth mentioning here. In his article, Shaw draws a distinction between prudential and ethical arguments. A prudential argument being one that works from the premise that every person acts in accordance with (their perception) of their own self-interest, and a moral argument being one that works from some premise based on an objective value (e.g. “we ought to maximise human welfare”). If I were in a metaethical mood, I might challenge that distinction on various grounds, but since I’m not in that mood right now, I won’t. I will just use the phrase “the ethics of cryonics” to refer to both the moral and prudential arguments surrounding cryogenics. It might be worth bearing that in mind as you read along.
Obama’s claim that the killing of Osama bin Laden diminished al Qaeda’s power in the Middle East is one of those fantasies that will lead to more bloodshed. As Seth Jones, a Rand Corporation analyst noted in a recent Wall Street Journal opinion, “”With a number of regimes teetering from the Arab Spring, al Qaeda is pushing into the vacuum and riding a resurgent wave as its affiliates engage in a violent campaign of attacks across the Middle East and Africa.”
I have been watching videos and reading articles about the Grand Elder Tata (Grandfather) Alejandro Cirilo Perez Oxlaj, also known as Wakatel Utiw (Wandering Wolf). The teachings he shares with the world are of the Maya; however, once we enter their world, we see that they are the core teachings of ‘life’.
Now, the little petty update: I start week 2 of Nutrisystem today. I had a bad night- I ate poorly for diner last night because I was so upset about Chance. I'm starting fresh again today.
for tendered nights, and soulful sights,
“But I will tell the truth: there is too much corruption and nepotism in the country. It is a question of how deep,” he said, adding that there are leaders in BN who also admitted that there are corruption and nepotism in the government.
Not that I'm ready for another quite yet, but I catch myself smiling at the new mom walking through Nordstrom with her month-old baby. It's just incredible to me how long ago that moment seems.
In Gingerbread Cyd Charisse gets kicked out of a fancy New England boarding school after a couple of indiscretions with a certain boy, which also, but not exclusively involved drugs, and returns to San Francisco, where she’s better known as the Little Hellion, a true attestation of her rebellious spirit. In San Francisco, she continues her wild adventures, involving coffee and a boy called Shrimp who she is convinced is her True Love. Cyd’s mother clearly cannot handle Cyd and after she’s been up to one too many tricks she has to spend the summer with her biological father Frank, who she’s seen only once in her life, when she was five, and whose only claim to fame was that he gave her a rag doll – Gingerbread – which Cyd still carries around everywhere, and that he helped her deal with a certain Problem she had. Enter a summer in New York City. In Shrimp, Cyd is back in San Francisco after having spent that summer in New York with her bio-dad and her brother Danny and his boyfriend Aaron. Set on rekindling the romance with her True Love Shrimp, Cyd also has to make decisions about her future: college or no college, Shrimp or no Shrimp.
After either the third or fourth social get-together, I woke up to alleviate myself after another successful, albeit hazy party. While pissing and unsuccessfully aiming for the toilet, I saw that my shaving gel had been misplaced. Then, I noticed that someone had used the shaving cream to write various gang symbols all over my door. I did not recall inviting any known gang members to my pajama party. Nor did I believe that youth toughs would use shaving gel to promote their gang on my bathroom door. This was the work of drunk morons. The predominant demographic that attended my social gatherings.
The following abstract is from a recent study titled: Active Thermitic Material Discovered in Dust from the 9/11 World Trade Center Catastrophe published by Bentham Science Publishers, a major STM journal publisher of 92 online and print journals.
Dylan did not hear the attacker until he’d been on top of him. The man wore a ski mask and shoved Dylan against a metal dumpster. He’d been so caught off guard that his head banged into the steel side and he went limp and fell to the litter strewn pavement.
I often want to buy a saddle and ask the neighborhood kids to come on over for riding lessons. I'd charge them $2 a ride and make a killing. They better bring their dorky helmets if they want to ride on my pony though. Kids these days have to ride bikes with those dumb helmets that make them look like pumpkin heads charging down the street. Or aliens chasing after me on two wheels. Oh my goodness, check out the freakish-looking Men In Black character coming right at me down the sidewalk. Holy shit balls, that thing is going to come right at me and stick me with some sort of memory blocker and then I won't be able to remember what I'm doing walking down the sidewalk in the first place.
Brittney is a very loved little girl.
I fortify myself with pure beauty. In the appreciation of beauty in the forms of nature, I can see the beauty in the person I have become. Yes, I have grown through and learned some powerful lessons in life. Oh Thanks God for those wonderful opportunities in which I have grown and blossomed into this magnificent human expression.
In another case last month, a 36-year- old man was charged with the rape and murder of a 10-year- old girl, Montesha Kekana, in the Vredenburg area on the West Coast.
It was all women on the floats. To ride on a float you have to be a member of their club. It costs thousands of dollars, and you have to buy your own beads to throw! However, Muses has some of THE best throws (the locals can also vouch for that). I got some really cool stuff from Muses. Knights of Bablylon were a revival of one of the parades from the 1800's so their floats were on the original wagon beds of the old parade. We're talking wooden wheels creaking along under modern floats. Wow!
DATES:
Samorost 2:
